In Chicago, Lou Malnati's makes a real deep dish with a crisp butter crisp, a quarter-pound of cheese, sliced tomatoes, garlic and a sauce with a hint of sweetness.  If you're into sausage, a whole slab of it is one layer of the pizza.   Otherwise, American Flatbread.  Although one could say it's not actually pizza...
I made some healthy food **FOR MYSELF** do you want some?  I'm going for a walk **BY MYSELF** do you want to come?  EDIT:  bold =/= passive aggression (kinda looks like that), just that the focus is on you doing it for yourself and if she wants to tag along, good on her. 
\ blocks things from being parsed by reddit's comment formatting system (I imagine you meant 100\*10\*500). 
Didn't you hear? It's not cool to like what other people like.
THAT'S WHAT SHE SAID!!  oh, wait
You just cost me $10! I had to go get some after reading this. A footlong chili cheese coney,  an order of cheddar peppers,  a large order of tots,  and a large cherry limeade.
Sounds good. Can't wait for it.
It's purrrfect.   Hi, I'm new to reddit...
So Australian reverends are arguing for better access to contraception now?
It's a good point but that open question should not give them the go ahead. In a place like Haiti laws aren't exactly static, a company like Monsanto has plenty of sway to change it in their favor.
Why is that hard for you to accept? Canning... Tickets ($3 a ticket, I'd say 2000 went per game, and there were about 5 home games per season) Sponsors.  Not to mention that new equipment isn't purchased every year.
If you don't have time to do it right, when will you have time to do it over?
why would an accounts age be of any significance?
Acid? Benzoyl Peroxide or something?
For nutrition info, all you need to read is "In Defense of Food" by Michael Pollan.  Truly eye opening!
hmmm interesting. Are you suggesting that the other Plutoids have to become less significant as well? And in your own opinion how would you explain the generational shifts that seemed to happen when Pluto moves from one sign to the other? (example: The recession pretty much coincided with Plutos entry into Capricorn).
we call it World Of Warcraft. perhaps you've heard of it? ;P
Tobacco, st. john's wort, guarana, yerba mate, gotu kola, ginkgo biloba, rhodiola rosea. Probably loads more than that, but that's a start.
Let's say there is a law that requires everyone to shave their hair, and that all citizens will receive $15.  You probably don't like this, all those weird bumps on your head will show or something, idk.  You get your head shaved, as you don't want to go to jail.  The barber holds out the promised sum of money.  Do you take the $15 from that law you don't like?
After reading your description, the question is, what kind of map projection are you using in the first place.  This google search should help:  plane to a sphere mapping  http://www.google.com/search?q=plane+to+a+sphere+mapping  http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stereographic_projection  etc etc.
Heh, either you've gotten soft or I have; I actually agree fully with this :D
First up checkout r/keto for some good recipes.  Secondly it is all about what you have in your fridge.  I have sausages, steaks, eggs, cheese, bacon, burgers, cottage cheese, peanut butter, lots of different nuts, protein powder, double cream, coconut oil, spinach, brocolli, cauliflower and cabbage.  You can create some really nice keto foods which taste simillar to the real thing. My favorite is rice, I cut up about 1/4-1/3 of a cabbage into tiny pieces, until they are rice sized (the smaller the better). Then I chuck them in a pan with lots of butter (your call on how much), then I add some salt and pepper a few spices and let it cook until they start turning brown.  The reason you need to keep carbs low is so that your body starts burning fat instead of carbs, basically your body will burn things in this order normally alcohol &gt; carbs &gt; fat. So you want to ensure that your carb and alcohol levels are low enough until you get into ketosis, once you are in ketosis (fat burning mode), you can eat the occasional bit of carbs, if your muscles are depleted of glycogen this is the 30grams per day, if you do lots of hard long training you can up your carbs and have no effect on your ketosis. Same with alcohol except it just basically pauses keto while your body consumes it then it normally just pops right back in.  You could eat tuna fish 3x a day but on keto you really want to eat full fat red meat, this is the most anabolic food, which is best for keeping muscle on if you are cutting with keto and help build more when bulking with it.  If you got any more questions fire away!
Do you want us to hold your dick while you pee too? Just kidding.  Ask her out!!  If it were me, I would find a concert, any one you have at least a little interest in, and ask her to go.  That's it. In person, or at least on the phone work better. Don't be a pussy and text or IM, it's way easier for you I realize, but it's way easier for her to shoot you down. If you still don't have the balls, do it next time you're out with her after you've had a drink or six...whatever it takes.  Something like this: Hey, I'm going to a show next week, I thought you might want to go?  You're so money, just fucking do it.
http://arachnoid.com/arachnophilia/index.php
My dog stares out the window for an hour prior to my dads arrival time. If he goes out of town she stares out the window around his normal arrival time and for a few hours after he should be home.   She stares out the window then at me then back out the window. As though I may be unaware that my dad isn't home. She does this every day until he returns. The amount she waits gets shorter as she starts to accept that shes stuck with me for a while. :( poor girl. 
Its dizzy in 2 for everyone, watch the other videos too. 
I disagree. If I had to buy coffee through the app store, I wouldn't buy it...
Alright, well I will be over to your house shortly to take all of your stuff, don't try to stop me that would be immoral.
I disagree. Spellcheck is.
I'm fairly certain that space would smell like nothing, since you'd be dead before taking your first breath of "air".  But in all seriousness, there are not enough particles in space for your olfactory receptors to pick up.  You won't be smelling strawberries the moment before you turn into a human popsicle.  This is a stupid argument.
I actually laughed aloud at how useless the zoom was.
I don't know why people always try to counter this with an argument, it's clearly correct.  Even [dictionary.com](http://dictionary1.classic.reference.com/help/faq/language/g09.html) agrees.
That wasn't me, but was very nice of whoever it is.  I didn't know you liked Reddit??
It'd be sweet if someone shopped a "painting" of Anubis on top of another pile of trash and have them face-off on the mean streets of Philadelphia.
Saw these while vacationing in Europe but its a lot cheaper :P
Stalin, Mao and Pol Pot made a religion out of themselves. That's not atheism.
Well played.
TAR. Heading to Atlanta this weekend for Gameday?
That's what I was gonna say. 
It's probably cause it's the worst fucking flavor of chips ever, so no one will care.
hmm needs a couple of modifications for python 3 me thinks but looks good.
Because they already have it sitting behind the desk in Gabe Newell's office, *duh*.
[mos def on bill mar](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fkmQpqCMyHc) its hard to listen to him talk in this and pretty much every other politically charged appearance he makes
Out of curiosity how many times has this been posted? I pasted the url in the searchbox and it had been submitted 2 times (to different subreddits) with 0 upvotes.
I don't understand why people are downvoting you...
Sure it'd be funny, but would it accomplish anything?
Since you aren't against GM and think patenting GM organisms is a bad idea, isn't a more reasonable response to change those patenting laws?
I'd try using bottled water (make sure it's not tap, Volvic is the best tasting water I know of) for a couple of weeks, and obviously non-fluoride toothpaste. I know it's expensive and bad for the environment, but at least you'll know if that's what's causing your dermatitis.
One step ahead of ya, buddy.
Voidray fazing still works ? I thought Blizzard patched that.
unicorn raptor ?? :D   its beautiful though
Not meant to be rude or anything, just an honest question:  Why? 
*After a few minutes in the bathroom*: [](/fy1 "Close enough.")
Ok so I have been trying to watch Mad Men and I haven't yet found what makes it the best show. Don't get me wrong the portrayal of the 60s is great but it hasn't really captured me in its "story". Like I don't see why it is such a great show to win all the awards. If you can enlighten me to all of its greatness I may try and stick with it and hope it captures me. 
Battlefield Bad Company 2 son...
 Madmen isn't so much driven by plot as chacter development. Mad Men is very slow and nothing much happens quickly.  It's more like real life where a disaster is forgetting to pick up the kids as opposed to Dexter where a disaster is somone coming into your place of work who has seen you kill somebody.  I really like it but it isn't like Dexter.  
Is it HTML5 compliant?
This assumes that only people who would oppose such bumper stickers are d-bags.
Because it's easier to judge distance between your car and another car than it is to hit a parking spot exactly between those lines. Maybe people are lazy and decide to just use some car as a measurement instead of looking at the lines on the parking lot.
I enjoyed the Rubik's Cube Rule.
That was the digg users at fault.  You guys kept digging up pics that were scraped from reddit with exact titles and everything when you should have been burying it.  The main reason people started scraping from reddit was because it is so easy to get original lists and infographics buried.  Some imgr post on the FP of reddit will get put on some fucking mommy blog and hit the right rail on digg.  It's baffling.  Why spend 3 hours creating content that will just get buried, when you can just copypasta shit directly from reddit?  Publishers and power users a like figured this out, and the quality of original content across the board has taken a serious shit.  Even on reddit the same pics are getting rehashed with different titles more often than not.
depends which [map projection](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Map_projection) you're using.  once you've chosen, describe the curve you want on the map and apply the projection's inverse  (e: the one you're probably used to is [the mercator](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mercator_projection), for which the Gudermannian is the inverse)
*I find you guilty of assault with a butcher knife and sentence you to 40 years in prison!* Damn... hey, do you have a knife I can borrow? *Why, certainly... here you are...*
sorry, i think im gonna miss it.. just getting on the bus now
pickled herring 
Oh, here's a thought; is your dns server behind a firewall? ACLs? Does your network support EDNS?  dig +short rs.dns-oarc.net txt
Thanks. Didn't know there was a group for it via steam... Doesn't look that active though, but it's more mw2'ers than I'm friends with over steam!
Sammich *and* dessert.
The KDE crowd has been crowing the same song with every point release since 4.0. How can I not be skeptical? I certainly hope that 4.5 is a usable desktop; but, as with so many other former loyal KDE users, I've gotten comfortable using GNOME. It seems to me that KDE will have trouble recovering previous users.  Everything about the release of the 4.0 series was done wrong. What concerns me most is that there was very little acknowledgement of that from the KDE team and often the opposite. Nothing suggests they learned their lesson. Does a similar story lie in the future for its KDE4 fans when KDE5 or KDE6 eventually roles around? Time will tell.
Everyone of my republican friends would always tell me that the economic affects of the current president is not felt for for at least 4 years. They always tried to attribute the good times under Clinton to Bush Sr. and any economic trouble during Bush Jr. as clinton's mistake. They have been very quiet as of recently. 
Little(Insidious(Silly(Parenthesis)))) ....Been(there(Done(that))))
It's the new wave of reddit hipster-dom, to label people who say and do odd things as mentally disable.  We're all trying to reach the pinnacle of homogeneous humanity faster.
Typically a pneumatic gun.  Depends on what animal.  Disables them immediately when done correctly.  This doesn't always happen in large slaughterhouses though due to the amount of animals passing through them.
Its one of those things you put on your tongue which generate an image using those white dots poking at your tongue. I've seen TV shows about the technology, it does provide you with a mental image, but I doubt the claims of altering your mind.
undershoot, yes.  or just *fail*
Stupid woman. He's trying to MATH.
It wasn't really criticism; it was more of an attempt at humor.  I thought it was sort of ironic.  Anyway, while I share your confusion over people clapping (the appreciation of the audience is never known by the performers) some art simply fills people with such emotion that they have to release it somehow.
Rotate rules, it's my favourite place. Criminal Records has better prices and more new stuff than pretty much anywhere, so I usually go to both (since they're on the same street and about 15 min apart).
I agree.. unless its well taken care of or called wildlife for it to be taken care of because its just a few days old.
Yes, , my reign of terror will soon be supreme.
best hip-hop album I own
Difference is, worked in Safari for me.
welcome.  i'm a forum user myself, and i actually requested that the admins hide the war+politics subforum from me so I wouldn't see it in the "new posts" feed.  seriously.  it's that bad.  so much hate and anger both ways, it's ridiculous.
I have the exact same problem in Canada. I PMed you my IP
Never worked on that one.   It seems to be working now, as it looks to have done it right at least three times in a row - and five if you count ' in'.  Great catch, thank you.
From now on it should be a rule that a headline cannot have the phrase "How our Grandparents Got Off" in it. The mental image you just gave me is soul crushing. 
Because school sports programs actually make money for the schools.
You would mock me if you knew. Random people when they seem me on university campus will ask a quick question.
Wow! Been using reddit for almost half a year and didn't know about modifying your front page reddits till now. Much thanks! :D
sports programs generate revenue. 
Do not care. And frankly, sick of hearing about Glenn Beck.
A couple of my friends once did their own challenge where they had to write a novel in one day. Same word count as NaNo, but with only 24 hours. They completed it, but their sanity certainly wasn't the same. haha. Best of luck! :) 
Massive downvotes but no rebuttals so far. Keep it classy, Reddit.   
Not a good time to be answering questions like these!
Apparently I'm the only one who both got this to work and was at all moved by it. Granted, I jumped into it without any expectations, and I hadn't lived there in a while. Still, I was really impressed.
They need to sell complete seasons of Pete and Pete...that show was epic when I was a kid.
over here too.  predestination, perhaps?
What do you think of the various styles that exist?  Any that you would fear having to compete against in a dangerous situation?  Any martial arts you think is a complete joke (aside from BS like Tybo)?  Secondly, what do you think about some of the more popular martial arts movie stars, such as Jet Li, Donnie Yen, Tony Jaa?   Third, is there any form of martial art you would love to study but haven't for one reason or another (I personally would like to study mui thai borano, but prob. won't have any luck finding anyone in the U.S willing to train).
[Zombiefit](http://zombiefit.org/category/wod/)
Curse you, thumbnail...you lied to me!
[You talk like a fag, and your shit's all retarded.](http://i.imgur.com/bnXF5.gif)
I think this is a perfect application for XP Performance Edition if you are using XP that is.
That's because 7 8 9 silly
My old house, my moms house, my *CURRENT* apartment, and my old high school all fail to work. :(
I'm not sure either. Maybe because I said dick? I dunno, it just keeps going down.
Oh you.
For me I would have to say music. There is nothing else that moves me so.
You are both a creator and a creation.  A very flawed creation, but a creation nonetheless.
I rest my case.
Well, given that it's not built in, (*which it totally should be*), would you *want*any random app to be able to take a screenshot of whatever it wanted whenever it wanted?
A lawyer decides he's had enough of the grind, so he buys some land and moves out to the country. The day he moves in, a truck pulls up and a man gets out.  "Howdy partner. I'm your new neighbor."  "It's nice to meet you."  "I'm having a party tonight, if you'd like to come by."  "That sounds great."  "I'm just warning you, there'll be some drinkin'."  "That's alright. I know how to pace myself."  "There'll be some fightin'."  "You know what, I'm a lawyer so I can talk myself out of tricky situations."  "And there'll be some screwin'"  "Well, I've been single for a while, so that sounds like fun. What time should I show up?"  "Doesn't matter. It'll just be the two of us."
This looks identical to the one in Little Havana, FL on 8th st and 27 ave.
Damn!  He broke his guitar!
I rest my case.
You found that funny? It wasn't even the least bit funny. It was rather sad and moving actually. It got me a bit misty.  A modern take on the Ugly Duckling but without the life-affirming tone, more like "life sucks but you can make the world a better place if you hang in there."
This was the first episode I believe. Its been awhile. Anyway that bligger can do what he wants with funky fresh breakdance moves like those.
Wow, 12 a day?!  I feel better about myself now!  Also, remember hat your friend is a piece of shit because he's a piece of shit, not because of drugs.  He may kick the habit, but he won't all of a sudden turn into a productive member of society as a result
Oh weird... I remember playing this at a friends house as a kid, and I loved it soo much.  I couldn't remember the name though.   I even started making a similar game for android based on my memories and what I thought would be fun.   But now that I'm playing it, it's... underwhelming.
This makes me wish they brought Radiohead.tv back. 
I think guys can tolerate a lot. I use nuvaring so every time my bf penetrates me, he feels my ring. He doesn't care in the slightest. If anything it makes him feel better, because it is something tangible to remind him I'm on birth control.
He's got hand.
He tried a few different methods to reduce cheating after that. As far as I know, the Prof now has them use non-internet enabled machines and has a USB key that he brings to you and you copy your test to in front of him.  Both me and my GF have been T.A's, and I've gotten many tests/papers/exams marked by T.A's. Lazy TA's that are there for the booze cash don't really make accurate marks (which seems to be about 70% of the time IME). The people that rightly loose marks for missing semi-colons can't get them back, the problem is the ones that DIDN't lost marks don't complain or tell the prof so they loose them.
Strangely enough, the FAQs and Reddiquette are the first things I read on Reddit.
Are you me? Because I've been in that situation at least 4 times.
If your area has a large enough Mexican immigrant population, there could be a Spanish language grocery store, they'll have it.
That sucks, even season 8 was kinda hard for me with the new characters I didn't really care for... The core 5 people (JD, Turk, Elliot, Carla and Cox) were a system that shouldn't have been messed with! They should've gone out with dignity rather than drag it on too long...
BenTheTank, this thread isn't nearly as interesting as I thought it would be.  I feel that I did actually address what you've said, though I disagree with the need for "quantifying" my opinions.  My own experiences, and those of the women around me, are what touch my heart.  Right now, since I'm a mother of two very young children, it's understandable that I would focus on the role of (and treatment of) mothers in our society.  I watch sadly as my working mom friends face challenges you will never have to deal with.  It's easy to sit and smugly judge these women when you will NEVER have to face their realities and make these types of choices.  So honestly, get off your high horse.  You're not furthering the discussion.  You're judging, and being kind of a dick.
[This one.](http://www.everymac.com/systems/apple/imac/stats/imac_se_dv_400.html)
&gt;Nevada doesn't have personal income taxes  I know  &gt;you might not pay "Income Taxes"  But like I said, you definitely pay taxes. Sales and Excise: [Nevada levies a 6.85% general sales or use tax on consumers, which is above the national median of 5.85%.](http://www.taxfoundation.org/research/topic/42.html)  Property: [Nevada is one of the 37 states that collect property taxes at both the state and local levels.](http://www.taxfoundation.org/research/topic/42.html)  Do you buy gas or cigarettes?  [Nevada's gasoline tax stands at 33.1 cents per gallon, which ranks 8th highest nationally. Additionally, Nevada's counties are permitted to levy "local option" gasoline taxes. Nevada's cigarette tax stands at 80 cents per pack of twenty and ranks 33rd highest nationally. The sales tax was adopted in 1955, the gasoline tax in 1923 and the cigarette tax in 1947. ](http://www.taxfoundation.org/research/topic/42.html)  **tl;dr - YOU PAY TAXES**
I too am a happy BofA customer of ~3 years. The only annoying thing I encountered is that you have to call em to clear any uncharacteristic payments (e.g. when buying something $500+ from somewhere you've never shopped before) or they'll not let them go through and might even lock your account.
I don't recommend jumping ship. The 18-55 kit lens is **ridiculously sharp** at the 18mm range, even at wide open.  As for upgrading, go for the D300 or D300s first. Until you get some more full-frame (new or old) lenses, your D700 will be limited at every range except at 50mm because of your 50mm f/1.8D.  The D300 will be great for your long exposures because the CMOS sensor doesn't have the weird purple fringing at the corners like the CCD the D40 uses. I've been using my D300s for test exposures of up to 27 minutes long. (Longest time available is about 30 minutes.)  Also, knowing how to do manual focus well will open a gigantic range of great, cheap lenses for you. But if you really want great AF, which is a boom at f/1.8, go for the D300 or D300s first.  Full frame won't be used at its full potential until, like I said earlier, you get some more full frame lenses. Anything without DX or similar labeling will usually be full frame.
I've been using Handcent for a long time, and it's never done anything like that. On a side note, that shit is hilarious.
The problem with dip stripping, and especially older items that were assembeled with hide glue, is the (usually hot) caustic material used will dissolve the hide glue and all the joints come loose. If it is a veneered piece, you run the risk of delaminating all the veneer and it usually comes off in strips that are not repairable. I have re-glued many old stile and rail doors that came to me as a pile of sticks after dip stripping. They are never quite the same.  If this truly a worthy piece, consult with an experienced furniture refinisher that has local references going back several years. It won't be cheap, but it will be done correctly and last a lifetime.  Good luck!
The Books - Take Time.  It's on YouTube.  I highly recommend it.
1. Nine Inch Nails (industrial) 2. Brand New (alt rock) 3. Rage Against the Machine (rapcore) 4. Pendulum (drum and bass) 5. Good Charlotte (punk rock) (only their first 2 albums, mostly for the nostalgia factor)  4 and 5 are subject to change a lot, that is what they currently are.
Hahah, oh goodness. Its been a long day. Now to delete the post.
Colbert: The True Patriot
*hits square on the stomach....
Huh, that's funny. I seem to recall watching it with Safari last night and it seemed to work fine.
Sooboy as well.  Message away.
TED ftw...http://www.ted.com/talks/lang/eng/derek_sivers_how_to_start_a_movement.html
She was probably paid to wear that.
honestly, from Day One my Android phone (running 2.1) feels like a work in progress - this is just one of many things that seems like the devs started something, got it to the point where it's maybe bug-free, works *ok*, definitely not *finished* ...and now it's part of my phone and I can't even replace it with a 3rd-party product that actually works *well* - without "rooting"
Sorry, we didn't make enough hats for all of you. We have enough for 12.
When the senators in your party refuse to actually vote for cloture as a bloc because they don't give a fuck about the country.
I agree that the they shouldn't charge but it is far cheaper then getting towed by asshole managers who won't let a car sit for more than a half hour...
Property rights seem like a pretty arbitrary privilege when we're talking about developers who pretty much set the tone of a big region of a city.   Besides, go back far enough (just a couple hundred years) and property rights came about just by some dude saying "THIS MINE NOW."  Seems pretty stupid to me.
Heres my favorite.  Two condoms walk down the street. They walk past a gay bar with 50 cent shots. One condoms says ,"wanna get shitfaced?"
Young, 18-year old women getting drunk underage around older, possibly also drunk men..sketchy scenario for everyone.  And no, I live in Cincinnati. A couple of local bars here do it.
Facebook isn't private.  The least they could do before snapping the screen shot is to tell these fucking morons they're retards. And don't be afraid of the back lash, you don't want these idiots as family or friends.
Maybe you should go to class or I dunno, study or go outside :).
But the more Gs you want to pull, the lower a pressure you'll need over the wings, and the more likely you are to cool the air below the dew point. Sure, it's possible to see condensation like this at 1G if the air is humid enough, but all other things being equal, more Gs -&gt; more condensation.
Ok, so Sinus Rinse/Neti Pot for your nose, now how about your ears?
I've heard that joke before, but instead of IT guys, it was with Redditors.
Whoa, give it a chance, seriously, I'm like this with every game i've ever played. half life 2 is a phenomenal game.   And having it turn you away from steam is a bit like having a crap song turn you away from iTunes. 
Why you're welcome sir.  I used my monocle to make the positive identification.  Good day, and great bug!
I think it's ridiculous to change your style because you lost weight if you're a guy.  You should have two types of clothes, functional (tshirts, mesh shorts, sneakers) and your nice clothes (button ups, slacks, jackets, shoes).  The fit shouldnt change much with weight loss, you should just always wear clothes that fit.  Girls are a different story.  
Upon further review of your argument:  Please refrain from self-defeating arguments, god cannot create space no matter how capable he is as space is nothing. I literally mean nothing, it doesn’t exist—it is the default before anything is created or exists there. Furthermore adding a step between c and d is self-defeating as well (such as removing a portion of the object to create space to move it) as it implies that before god does something to it the object is immovable.
&gt;If I die suddenly my friends have instructions to post it here, even though no one knows who I am.  You might want to prep your friends a bit, since: &gt;Pro-tip: Askreddit is for questions only. Non-questions will be be deleted.  So maybe something like "Does anyone know where andrewsmith1986 is?"   No, wait... that won't work, because... &gt;The idea is that /r/AskReddit should only be for questions that generate interesting discussions,  Hmmm... maybe "Has andrewsmith1986 finally answered whether there is life after death?" or "How much weight did andrewsmith1986 lose yesterday in his dying breath?" 
Words change meaning, english is a very malleable language.  In the interests of not being childish, I am now going to refer to stuff as first world...FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD FIRST WORLD   I'm done now. :D
&gt;  I'm fairly stable now, but off the pills and hormonal to boot?  You could give yourself another year to adjust to life without crazy pills.
You do realist that just about everything is customisable in opera?.
It's sterile when it comes out. But I remember being told that it's a breeding ground for all sorts of things once it cools down and has been outside of the body for a while.
Good advice. How long would you recommend studying for? Is it safe to take the December LSAT and still have a reasonable chance of getting into a decent law school?
quadrant score is virtually meaningless. lets see some real world results.
&gt;Just because you never heard of them, so they don't exist, or represent the same kind of people he is discussing against? Your argument is so weak that it needs to be improved to qualify as an ad hominem.  I'm just saying these "50 amateur writers" don't represent the new atheists.  The four primary authors DO represent the new atheists.  And if you knew anything about atheists, you'd know that none of them share any beliefs beyond, "I don't believe in God."   If he wants to pin these insults on the "new atheists" then he must find something that the four primary proponents, or even most of them share.  He hasn't.  &gt;Nothing we know about the brain and the evolution of culture warrants your position. It is just sheer blissful optimism.  Remember, that arguing from a lack of knowledge is exactly what the author is whining so much about.  You seem to know very little about cultural evolution, neuroscience, or modern psychology, or the scientific views of morality.  At the very least, spend a few hours on TEDtalks, and please start informing yourself about the state of the science behind the "new atheists" and their actual arguments if you wish to debate these topics honestly.  &gt;I didn't say that it would apply to everyone, but that those kind of people existed.  The author simply wishes that his "new atheists" would place themselves in a dour and nihilistic light, in order to somehow "show their commitment", as if that somehow changes the strengths of their arguments.  &gt;Religion itself predates moral patterns. &gt;There is evidence of religion before the homo sapiens walked on Earth.  Citation please, I've never heard this. Bonobo Apes have been shown to have significant moral reasoning, and even exhibit altruistic behavior. Only humans have been shown to hold religious views.  http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=a8nDJaH-fVE   &gt;Really? Where?  Hitchens in his book God is not Great, and Dawkins in his book, Greatest Show on Earth. Both talk about the evolutionary roles of religion in many of their lectures and debates. Which books by the "four horsemen" have you read?  NOW.. for the real question, and the only one that really matters... Are the "new atheists" correct, that religious conceptions of God are simply a figment of believer's collective imagination? You'll notice that the article never actually addresses the REAL questions posed by the "new atheists". He offers no real rebuttal of their arguments, and also offers no attempt to provide compelling evidence for his God. The whole article is simply trying to draw attention away from the real questions.  And that's why my opinion of the author is that he's a whiny douche, because a true gentleman debater will go out of his way to ignore what he "doesn't like" about his opponent, and will address the true core of his opponent's argument. ** He simply does not address the real issues presented by the new atheists.**  Instead, he speaks specifically about what he doesn't like about "them".
way to make UCF proud Marcus. GOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO KNIGHTS!
Yes because it can be converted to parking time at bank of america
Ooh it's on Instant.  I'll check it out.
My mind is not made up at all.  I just want you to consider a single data point suggesting government mortgage regulation was a contributing factor the financial crisis.  You've refused to consider said data point because, as you say, you've studied economics extensively (irrelevant to the data point), and the fact that there were other contributing factors (so what?)  You mentioned FHA as the sole relevant housing regulations.  I mentioned CRA, including recent (90's) and relevant amendments.  You've refused to allow this to factor into your own model for the financial crisis.  lesson for you: when you find credible/verifiable data (as mine is) which conflicts with your model (as it does) you have 2 choices: alter/abolish the data, or alter/abolish your model.  Sadly, you've chosen to abolish the data based on the fact that you've studied economics, and there are other data points about the financial crisis.  I never claimed housing regulation as the sole cause, merely a contributing factor.  You claimed FHA to be the only relevant regulation, and asked me to provide you examples of others (which I did).  Other different contributing factors to the crisis does not conflict with my model (that housing regulation was a contributing factor).  Therefore, the only data I would be "forced" (as you falsely claim) to dismiss would be data showing that government housing regulation was not a contributing factor at all.  You've failed to provide any such data.  You've even failed to provide any example of what you meant by data I must be dismissing.  In fact, it is you who dismisses data.  Data I provided to you, and repeatedly asked you to consider and either refute, or update your model.  You've done neither.  I hope you can learn from this, 2 lessons from all this so that you may continue to learn and grow your knowledge free from the shackles of pride and arrogance. 1. never trust arguments from authority 2. if credible/verifiable data exists, which conflicts with your model, you must alter/abolish your model, not the data.  If your model doesn't fit with reality, it's wrong.  It doesn't matter how smart you are, how elegant or warm and fuzzy your model is, it's wrong.  Good day to you, sir.  And please, consider my advice.
I'll have what you're having.
I clap over arty films, or even just dramas. I don't clap at the end of comedy or action films.  Basically, it has to do with the appreciation for the movie. If I feel that the movie was emotionally touching or thought provoking art rather than just entertainment, I clap.
&gt; And for that I am gonna have to see a doctor.  Your comment suggests that you have not seen a doctor about this. If you haven't seen a doctor about this how do you know that it's klinefelter's syndrome? I hope you are not self diagnosing. If you haven't, please go see a doctor and get a real diagnosis. 
Oh, haha, I should of clicked through.
Why is Glenn Beck so baseless?  FTFY.
9,993,457 bottles of beer on the wall, 9,993,457 bottles of beer. Take one down and pass it around — 9,993,456 bottles of beer on the wall!
I used to walk a boxer pup I had a long time ago. We were walking past a house with the garage door open and two German shepherds came running and attacked her. She was hurt badly but I decided I was never going to walk her without [this](http://www.bridestreasures.com/ShopSite/media/RB1987.jpg). This fixed all the problems.   EDIT: I should mention I never even had to use it, most dogs just avoided me when I sticked it up in the air. 
I have never had the issue, but I drink &amp; toke regularly. I usually get a booze buzz then go home and smoke or I step out fro a quick toke and return.
Oh.   My.  Goodness.  Really?
Chairs upholstered with new leather?  (organizes vegan protest)
This comment made me laugh enough to post my first comment.
Filho da puta, som as três e media da manhá, me cagho em Dios!
They're not the ones making the noise.  They're not the ones engaging in dialogue with atheists.  They're not the ones representing their religion to the public. It's a shame.  The dog that didn't bark.
No. That doesn't mean it doesn't happen, but I've never been there, and there has only been one inmate death (suicide), and two staff deaths (sleep apnea and suicide, respectively) since I started in '07.
 Beck's alcoholism and lurid behavior that the man himself admitted in a tearful rant on why he is an evangelical.
Axioms and definitions are invented, their implications (theorems etc) are discovered. Of course what we discover guides what definitions/axioms we "invent" next.
Who the hell said phone sex isn't serious business?  And I'm actually pretty successful in my current role of Cardinal in the Catholic Church thank you.
It is not a "belief", it is a legal situation in the US and UK.     Captn O is not saying there is no personal/societal upside, but that any upside does not exceed the legal risk of having your life permanently ruined. 
Does this mean my car runs on Twinkies???
Well the elevator I've used, it worked. Maybe I just got lucky and everytime I did the trick when no one else called the elevator, but it worked on repeated occasions. [](/troll)
you need to eat more fiber
my dick is 7.5"
I came here to say exactly that.
When I first found /. many, many years ago, I thought it worked like digg does.  Then I found out it didn't, and I wondered why someone didn't make a site that did.  I am sure I am not the only one, so it is not a new idea in any way.
[](/okay)  ....   [](/troll)
I was gonna say that Art of War was the *only* book I'd read in the list =D
I gotta give props to Funimation for putting up subs for free/ads almost as quickly as fansub groups.
They are comparing California? Netherlands,  Take our Mexican gang members and our ghetto blacks.  Then let's see if you can close prisons. 
Sounds hilarious, but it might also be a good recipe for a riot.  At least it won't be boring.
I've seen geese and loons share the same water many times, I think it was the idiots at the rally that scared them away.
All this computer hacking is making me thirsty.  I better order a Tab.
Haha, well as it turns out you must make sure you read the fine print. I found out the hard way that I can no longer see why kids love cinnamon toast crunch, not because i am admitting adult hood (also 19) but because i am a certified life guard : ( sad day. lol 
Bukowski reading the poem on a [DOOM track.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=GKum7WWeq0Y)
Opera does that too
See my reply below. The was used particularly because it isn't an existing language. 
[Salvia Divinorum](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Salvia_divinorum)
What the fuck does the German media have to do with this?
Right now? Television. Haven't watched TV for about 5 or 6 years. Oh, and apple. Mainly becaus- HEIL STEVE JOBS  And sobriety, for good reason.
Well, the navy might be interested...
Bat EGGS crazy.
&gt; Best. GPS. Evar.  Don't agree at all! Though it's awesomely usefull and I have used it more often than my Mobile Maps (actually only for the reason to use it).
Actually, I didn't. I Just checked out a bunch of their music though and it's right up my alley! Thanks again!
Haha! I love that clip! I remember when it first aired, I cried because I was laughing so hard.  Consequently, Will Ferrell was the guest for that episode and he came out with a banana and pulled the same trick. Hilarity abounds.
If you want to lose weight start in the kitchen, not the gym. That was the key for me.   Man the internet really makes me an asshole....  I'm sure you are a very sweet girl. I would likely be nervous around you in real life, and your boyfriend sounds like an insecure jerk. I hope you the best in life.
Raw tomatoes for me.  I thought they were so disgusting.  The one day in high school I had an inexplicable craving for them.  I had a few wedges with salt and pepper and found they were delicious.  Now I love them!
Only when you're full of shit.
Ohhh.. Haven't really looked into any of that. Someone is probably doing it. :)
All I see is this:  Real life Trees. The Reddit Weedit community. Welcome to the collective.   OH! is this in reference to those posts a while back about a Trees collective?   If I wasn't around for those posts I would have no idea. Why couldn't you just answer the question. I looked at the sidebar and didn't see a straight forward explanation...... my bad
Try 4chan.org...  That is, assuming you're sophisticated enough to fit in.
Dude, that shits more expensive than UC Berkeley
Still don't know why these are legal
[true story!](http://bit.ly/cb0xLk) I drive past this occasionally.
This is a strange phenomenon.  And what you say is true, if you spend all day puffing and then drink and puff, no worries.  Stay dry all day, get hamsied on liquor and then puff?  No bueno.
Grad student here, but I've taken up semi-permanent residency here, so I know how awesome CoMO can be during the summer. Quiet and beautiful! 
I just saw dick.   
I know I could probably just google this, but isn't that how Darwinian evolution works too? The giraffes with short necks die off and the long ones live, and they pass their long-neck genes onto their kids?
Yeasayer - [Madder Red](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=swZ_hMhwETg)  Truly the best song i have heard in years. 
where's my obligatory 'oh yeah I know him IRL' upvote? tight bastard
But what counts is you tried ;)
How can it be that food sprayed with chemical pesticides are as good as 100% natural food? Sure you'll get a vegetable here and there that only got minimal spray, but all in all the amount of pesticides they use is proven to lower the nutrition content by as much as 50% and in some cases, to cause health problems (especially for those that are allergic to the chemicals).
Bill Gates talked about a similar type of reactor to these in a TED talk this year. Serious people are starting to take it seriously, which seems like a good sign to me.
Absolutely. And just so you know, if you are landscaping around any office buildings, the women inside at their white collar jobs are totally checking you out while you work.  :)
Shoes: I can't give you advice.  Go to a nice running store and buy correct shoes if you want.  Some people do other things.  Clothing: I've gotten some nice stuff at goodwill.  You can also go to target.  Yes, fancy running clothing IS very nice--nice and expensive.  But you probably don't need all that stuff.  Since you are just starting out, you probably shouldn't spend more than 10 or 15 bucks on clothing until you (a) decide you actually like running and (b) know what you do and do not want (which requires some experimentation). I like short shorts (really!) and fast-drying t-shirts.  I don't like cotton.  I got a NICE pair of New Balance warm-up pants, in my size and color at the goodwill for 3.50.  Like new!  Can't beat that!
&gt;Which is where communication fits into all of this crap. As usual.  It's always all about the communication to be sure. But even I, and trust me I never have any trouble telling most everyone what I am thinking... I *would and have* hesitated to say something I feel might hurt my SO or make him feel emasculated in any way. Being assertive about sex, doesn't always come as second nature to the female gender. We have the whole slut-shaming thing hanging over our heads.   The funny thing about my relationship, is that it would be both of us with the spread sheet out, comparing and contrasting comments and responses, science geeks that we are.   This is what I know, as a woman. Every single woman that I know (and it's a lot of them), will forgive a multitude of sins, bad behavior, and crappy treatment from someone that rocks their world in the sack. I call it being fuckmotized. And I know that a woman who is not satisfied, will find fault with everything. Never mistake the power of that hormone bath. 
[On the left is what natural Corn looks like, on the right..well you know](http://imgur.com/JoPjj.jpg])
That last one featuring Betty White made me laugh. 
Well since I used my one upvote I'll just have to downvote you.
Try wearing a Glenn Beck costume and tell her again.
For the curious:  Disc one  1. Spice Girls : "Say You'll Be There" 2. George Michael : "Fastlove" (Forthright Edit) 3. Peter André : "Flava" 4. East 17 featuring Gabrielle : "If You Ever" 5. Deep Blue Something : "Breakfast at Tiffany's" 6. Pet Shop Boys : "Se a vida é (That’s the way life is)" 7. Babybird : "You're Gorgeous" 8. The Beautiful South : "Rotterdam" 9. Dodgy : "If You're Thinking of Me"   10. Crowded House : "Don't Dream It's Over"   11. The Bluetones : "Marblehead Johnson"   12. Ocean Colour Scene : "The Riverboat Song"   13. Sheryl Crow : "If It Makes You Happy"   14. Garbage feat. Tricky: "Milk"   15. Neneh Cherry : "Woman"   16. Lighthouse Family : "Goodbye Heartbreak"   17. Pulp : "Something Changed"   18. Cast : "Flying"   19. Suede : "Beautiful Ones"   20. Belinda Carlisle : "Always Breaking My Heart"  Disc two  1. Dina Carroll : "Escaping" 2. Boyzone : "Words" 3. Eternal : "Someday" 4. Backstreet Boys : "I'll Never Break Your Heart" 5. Damage : "Love II Love" 6. Clock : "Oh What A Night" 7. Louise : "Undivided Love" 8. Ant and Dec : "When I Fall in Love" 9. 911 : "Don't Make Me Wait"   10. Strike : "My Love Is for Real"   11. Faithless : "Insomnia"   12. BBE : "Seven Days and One Week"   13. Stretch 'n' Vern : "I'm Alive"   14. Healy and Amos : "Stamp!"   15. Livin' Joy : "Follow The Rules"   16. Wildchild : "Jump to My Beat"   17. Underworld : "Pearl's Girl"   18. Space : "Neighbourhood"   19. Björk : "Possibly Maybe"   20. Shed Seven : "Chasing Rainbows"
Not sleeping with anything that has a pulse isn't religious. It's about self-respect.
is your cheese actually orange? please show me a pic
No. She deliberately set out to get blackout drunk so she'd have an excuse for doing whatever she wanted. No apologies would be acceptable.
FUCK THERE'S A CAT THERE.
The article ignores some key facts. Same-sex pederasty has more to do with Afghan culture than Islam in general. The Taliban was actually strictly opposed to homosexuality of any kind, and pederasty died down significantly during their reign, reappearing after they were defeated.  Not everything can be laid at fundamentalist Islam's door.
Smitherman has been invisible for some reason, but if you dig you can sometimes find an intelligent quote with his name on it.
(1)Tell me what you love so much about rooting.  (2)Speed. To be able to control it. To know that I can control something that's out of control
&gt;Because i want to keep my animal safe and i don't like keeping him just out an about in the van because there are no car seats or seatbelts for dogs.  May I introduce to you, [dog seatbelts](http://www.ruffrider.com/). That's just one of the many products out there. I think the issue is if your dog does not hinder your driving, your dog is still not safer in your lap when it comes to an incident you cannot avoid. Even if it's a tiny dog, it still has the risk of being flung through the windshield by physics. 
gtfo
It comes with advanced gayvionics, and AIDS to navigation.
It still does that, though it throws me off every time it does.
wow, only 1 of the 2 were shopped.  Tell me, why exactly IS she wrapped in the flag?
:(
resbyterian Blue Hose vs Wake Forest Demon Deacons Live Streaming Game On Ur PC Right Now .
Randy  Overly excited in a sexual manner. See also horny. Do I make you randy, baby? Do I?
Is that that letter all you saw? Oh sorry. You are the religious guy. Imaginary old man in sky will let you in, scarcely, without commitment.
Comment on the program you linked to: what the heck does it do?   I'm a web developer, so it seems like I'd be your target audience, but nothing on that page tells me what the program does or what separates it from similar applications. Is it an IDE, an HTML editor, or something else entirely?
[I'll just leave this here.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Q1ZeXnmDZMQ)
Either way you end up with more traffic in the long run.
you're*
Link?
As you run, your body will start to prioritize its blood distribution. It moves to more essential and active areas (legs, core) and will decrease flow in your hands. Often times they may get cold as a result, which is why you might see marathoners wearing gloves on a warm day. Is this what's happening to you? Maybe.
The entered address does not contain enough data for this experiment to run.
you probably already did on a waiver on some piece of paper you signed when being treated at a teaching hospital.   This just in: "SKY IS BLUE IN THE MORNING"
It's not apathy, it's realistic.  The two parties are similar on almost every issue, except for a few that don't really matter, which they then argue loudly about.   Both parties are for the federal reserve?  check. Both parties are for war?  check. Both parties are for increased government power?  check. Both parties are for israel?  check.   Both parties are for spying on americans?  check.  Come on, give me a break.  If ANY of those are "my" issue, and I want to vote to change it, **there is effectively no party I can vote for.**  That's fucking bullshit, okay?   Yes, I vote in every election.  Too bad the electoral college changes my vote.  
G-D! lol  Who do you think you are fooling? (Beside yourself that is)
You use your mouth purtier than a 2 dollar whore.
It looks like you forgot to exit the loop on line 138.
And impossible to stay mad at.  Even when he [gets a bit carried away...](http://i.imgur.com/6gWwQh.jpg)  Back story to that; When I bought my house they left that couch in a guest room (the same room he stays in while I'm at work) He lodged his chew toy into the cushions and fought like hell to get it out.
Yeah, and he himself is clearly difficult and at times mad. 
If she really needs the job as she stated then likely a lawyer is out of her financial means. This is quite possibly what led to him coming on to her in the way that he did, he knows that the money provides incentive to stay/put up with advances or more, and if she doesn't, there's no repercussions. Personally I say get the fuck out of there. If you don't have dependants it's not worth it by a long-shot, if you do I'd still try for something else.
You missed the point. Most girls would never invite a guy out for dinner on a first date. Meaning that it's not a good way to try and impress a person you're interested in.   I don't know many women who are worried about impressing a guy anyway. It goes against nature.  In business the person that wants the deal to happen is the one that does the impressing.  Dinner is a gesture in most cases nothing more. Later on dinner is cause for celebration and what not.
One note on Breaking Bad.  The pilot is amazing but it is not like that through the whole season.  There are about 3 or 4 episodes that are as crazy.  The third season is all amazing episodes.  Solid show.
food. all i do from the time I wake up in the morning from the time i go to sleep at night is think about what i want to cook and whether or not it's time to eat. it's a miracle i'm not 400 pounds
From the wikipedia article you linked:  &gt; The term "dialect" does not apply to other regional languages in Spain such as Catalan, Galician, and Basque
cuccinelli is a tool... 
To put things in?
Damn, she's hot! Reminds me of some actress, but I can't place her. Gillian Anderson, maybe? Her bone structure reminds me of some chicks I know with a lot of Scottish in their ancestry. How about her?
Take My Breath Away by Berlin.  Woohoo!
Wait, the band are hipsters or the fans are hipsters? Because I know for a fact true hipsters can't shred like that nor will they listen to said music due to said shredding. 
So that they'll grow up in a family which shuns effective education?  Think of the children, not the man they'll inconvenience.
A gloss black enamel (if its gloss), maybe model paint from a hobby store.
What I think would be immensely interesting is self blinding yourself using only the tongue detector and a camera to move around. Then after getting used to it, opening your eyes and putting the camera behind your head. Now you can see 360 degrees. Sweet!  It would also just be interesting to see how the world looks through your tongue. 
Numerical Analysis &amp; some non-euclidean geometry (about 15 years ago)
eh, just do a total de-prius and make it rwd with a combination of supra and is300 parts.
gp.  i don't really care i guess.  just hoping it'll let me sleep.  i'm going to start seeing a psychiatrist next week who will be taking over my prescriptions.  i've been on the welbutrin for 8 weeks and, if anything, feel worse.
bullshit, more shit, pile of human dung?
A skid stop wasn't an option?
Ahaha, no I missed the first post, but this made me chuckle so I upboated.  
Same here. I remember it tasting much better as a kid. 
I feel like I'm missing something...
&gt; You completely missed the point....it just whizzed right over your head.  Disagreeing with you doesn't mean that it whizzed over my head.  &gt; None of that has anything to do with being a "convict"...it's about them being a bad person.  Convicts have usually done bad stuff which is evidence that they may not be a good person.  I'm all for giving people second chances, but its not out of the question to actually set some boundaries with people who have shown evidence of being less than trustworthy.  For example, not allowing them to stay at your house.  &gt; I repeat, if the guy hadn't of been caught....would you be cool with him then?  In that case he wouldn't be a convict.  No, but that's irrelevant to the discussion.  In both cases we're discussing a known convict.  And the consensus is that the fact that those people are a convict makes them less trustworthy.  Your assertion is that these people may be good people who just made a bad decision.  That may be the case.  I'm certain there are plenty of people out there.  Still doesn't mean that they immediately deserve high levels of trust, such as levels allowing them to stay in your home with your children, when there is evidence that they are not good people.  &gt; I'm not going to defend what my friend did...of course it's wrong.  Yes, and its evidence of him not being an entirely good person.  You may think that he's a good person who made one mistake, and that may certainly be the case.  I've also known people who made mistakes, their friends swore up and down that they were good people, and they turned out to be bad people.  I'd say that the fact that your friend was caught stealing stuff warrants some caution in certain situations.  &gt; I would point out that he's not stealing stuff from people....he was shoplifting small items from stores.  Stores are owned by people.  He was stealing from people.  &gt; That's clearly not a "victim-less" crime...but it's very different than taking peoples personal belongings.  Perhaps in impact to the people in question, but its still stealing from people.  &gt; I'm not saying that's ok...of course it's not.....  Good, because it sure seemed like  you were trying to heavily downplay it.  &gt; but there was a lot of other stuff involved. It's not like he just did it for giggles,   You said he did it for the thrills, so I don't think you can blame me for my confusion.  &gt; he was struggling to deal with a lot of stuff and ended up picking a bad way of doing it.  Its regrettable that he was dealing with "a lot of stuff," but other people may not have that context.  Its unreasonable to expect people to disregard any evidence of your friend's lack of trustworthiness because he was "going through a lot of stuff."  People like your friend should get an opportunity to build back up that trust, but I'm not going to apologize for being careful to not allow your friend into a situation where he can repea  &gt; The point is he's a decent guy who did something bad....have you never done anything bad? Are you beyond reproach or something?  I have done bad things, yes.  Usually they required for me to rebuild trust that has been broken.  People did not treat me in the same way, and I had to work hard to get to a point where they did.  It would be unreasonable of me to expect them to treat me the exact same way when I have given them solid evidence that they should not trust me.  &gt; The point is, he is now a "convict" and soon to be former convict....but that fact doesn't give you much to go on in terms of what sort of person he is.  Granted, but it is evidence.  People should have a chance to explain themselves and rebuild their reputation.  But when dealing with imperfect information, sometimes people have to make decisions.  Being a convict is evidence that someone has done something bad, and that affording them a constricted level of trust may be warranted.  &gt; There are lots of people who were sent to jail for minor offenses, or stuff they didn't do.  Yes, its imperfect, which is why "second chances" are important.  &gt; There's lots of criminals who did bad stuff, but have now reformed.  Yes, which is why "second chances" are important.  That's not a reason to grant full trust immediately upon release. &gt; Your anecdotal story means nothing, except you met one guy who was a jerk but seemed nice....  My story was meant to illustrate that, despite people claiming that someone else is nice or reformed and should be trusted, doesn't mean they actually are.  Tons of mothers of thugs think that their babies are angels. Tons of friends will swear up and down that their convict friends are actually really good guys.  It doesn't mean its true.  It doesn't mean its false either.  Which is why I explicitly said that people should be able to rebuild their reputation.  But what I'm also saying is that some level of caution is warranted.  Letting a convict stay in your house?  &gt; it has nothing to do with what we're talking about.  It has everything to do with what we're talking about.  You're upset that people are emphasizing that he's a convict, and brought up an andicdotal story about your friend who is a convict but a good guy, and then extrapolating that people should let the convict thing slide.  I'm bringing up a story about a convict who people said was a good guy who really wasn't, showing that caution is warranted.
You Google it too, except read the links too. Its nothing of the sort.
What was the dose you took? I have some at home that I've been holding onto and want a good fun trip.
Choosing the accent is harder than it seemed at first, but a honest to goodness drawl will make me cream Every Single Time, but that's not exclusive.
I guess you weren't here that week.
Most of the horror stories are not the norm of their service. 9/10 complaints are people getting charged for over drafting.
Even if grades are good, community college is a good option to get your elective credits out of the way prior to transferring to a real college. Depending on the field you want to go into, though, college degrees may be overrated.   I haven't finished my A.S. Mathematics, yet I'm the top escalation point for NOC engineering in a large aerospace corporation. If you have the skills and are smart, private sector will pay money for it, and experience will follow. 
edah enekah eengana spell cheyan padaa...   ee valamben mark-eh onnum arriyeth-illa ... penna enah vanum?
It seems like nearly everyone is like this and I am one of only a handful of people that store actually useful information in their brains.  I always have to explain before any pop-culture-oriented game that I do not know anything because it is all trivial bullshit.
Who said your opinion wasn't valid? I'm just criticizing it, and you.  To recap: you're unable to listen to someone's opinion, no matter its validity, because you've made a judgment on their intent. That's stupid.
Is that a dude of a chick?
Looks more like the Excelsior class, from what i've looked at. though I'm not really a star trek fan. 
One of the songs, You're Never One, from Eminem's new album, Recovery, always pumps me up. Pumps me up for life and when I'm at the gym. Anyone should learn from him on how to dedicate a song. My favorite line(I thought of when I read the name of your site): SO Imma fuck til I die, yeah I'ma do it to death, And itstead of mourning your death, I’d rather celebrate your life.  The second verse is definitely the best. That's all.
Just keep winning with it. It will stop working most of the time, and you won't get complained at for it.
I only care about this when I have spend 20 minutes searching for a parking spot when there would be an extra empty one if this guy (and others in the parking lot) weren't such a bunch of assholes.
I'm afraid I don't have any good suggestions. I asked if there's any need on the Haiku OS mailing list....  Going multi-processor won't net you too much I guess ... and is just gonna be a pain if you are using traditional threads....  On the other hand, trying to find an app that fits the GPU's very special and very limited programming model is gonna be difficult.  ... but I guess you know all of that.  Maybe GraphicsMagick? http://www.graphicsmagick.org/index.html  ... or maybe some form of graphics processing library that you can set an algorightm/filter and have it run it on all the pixels in the GPU.  ... or if you are really good at this... various physics simulations projects
Yeah, I don't have a question. Just wanted to let you know I sympathize with you. College is a fucking waste of money and energy.
I wouldn't disable adblock for my own mother.
"Not real! Not flesh and blood like WE!"   -- Ren Hoek
It got stuck [here](http://i.imgur.com/rgLFS.png) in Chromium-dev 7.0.503.1. It loaded in Firefox4.0b4, but after entering my address it stopped loading at 97%.
According to my parents, I urinated on the doctor in the delivery room. One of my finer moments.
Pleasure Pizza. Their Santa Barbara pizza is awesome: Mozzarella, Parmesan, pepper jack cheese, spinach, artichoke, green onion. 
I get caught up in arguments sometimes as well, it is personal when someone attacks your words. But most of the time when I see it starting I just remember this is exactly what they want, and just ignore. I just cant imagine what some of these people are like in person, must be unbearable. 
I know the origins of the word chivalry, and for you that obviously tarnishes the word. For most people the word has a positive connotation.  Chivalry is about following rules to protect the weak, and weak use to mean female.   &gt;Further, its modern meanings are different from its medieval meanings.[2] Thus, the exact meaning of chivalry changes depending on the writer, the time period, and the region, so a comprehensive definition of the term is elusive.[2]
Album of the year: The Roots - How I Got Over.. Besides the last two tracks, it's head and shoulders above all the other albums I've heard. 2nd place probably goes to black keys - brothers.
I don't think many people looked at the username
&gt; C++ has standards (of various kinds) for these. No they aren't in the official standard but that is largely irrelevant. I can get socket and GUI APIs for C++ that have tools, documentation and work in a predictable manner across compilers and across deployment platforms.  How is this not identical for CL? Or any language but Java, for that matter?  &gt; Two of the major CL implementations on Windows cannot agree.  Are you compiling all of your C++ apps with two compilers from two separate vendors as well? Are you ignorant of cl-fad? You're grasping at straws.
It's been a while since I've been back home to Minnesota, but I've seen cashiers refuse to handle pork before.  Usually they just ask their supervisor to do it for them.  It's a mild inconvenience, but I get my bacon all the same.  Contrast this with pharmacies flat out refusing to sell birth control pills at all, and we see where the real religious extremism lies.
CM6 on the original MyTouch. Best ROM yet. The release candidates gave me some issues but the final version rocks it.
It is... it's a daddy job to make sure his little girl is happy!
This thread was a collection of quotes compromising a famous monologue from the first season of HBO's **The Wire**, given by D'Angelo Barksdale AKA "D".  
Then tattoo it?
You, sir, are my hero.
I'm happy to hear that things are looking better for you. Jane and her family seem awesome by all accounts, same for your brother and grandmother. I hope that with some time spent away your mother will come to realize the huge mistake she has made, though it may take a long time. Enjoy your life, enjoy college, and good luck to you in your life. 
I killed that skill with another past time of mine
Jefferson was Republican?
9,993,456 bottles of beer on the wall, 9,993,456 bottles of beer. Take one down and pass it around — 9,993,455 bottles of beer on the wall!
What about disabled people, homeless people, people will mental problems or lost limbs? Are they also social parasites or humans too?
My take on this: - The guy in the Harley shirt is an idiot and should be patted on the head, then ignored. - The guy on the greenscreen was right until towards the end when he made the seperation between black christians and white christians. We are humans floating around space on a ball of rock and iron. I hate the term 'nigger'. I hate when black people use it. I hate when white people use it. Black people seem to use it as an empowerment tool while 90% of the time, when white guys say it, it's derogatory. Mostly, I just consider it uncivilized. We've done enough genetic archaology to determine that aside from skin pigment, we've got the exact same organs, brains, and DNA as everyone else. I believe in equality regardless of race, sex, or religion. I also believe in free speech which means allowing idiots their right to speak. Let them talk, then let the public voice call them out for their stupidity. They should be allowed to use the word nigger. It doesn't mean they should be using that word however since it's offensive to civilized thought. We're all the same.
&gt; it would not necessarily remain with fewer ways, maybe we would invent a whole new load of ways It is not self evident that religious belief would be replaced by something else if it were to disappear, so really you're merely speculating that religion would be replaced by something else more than making a true, factual claim. However, this is why I (and most other atheists like me) encourage *critical thinking*, healthy scepticism and reason rather than just specifically atheism. Nobody ever started a war or caused unnecessary suffering because they were being *too reasonable*.
My god look at that tub, the caulking needs to be redone where the tile meets the tub good sir.
Beastie Boys. Wrote 'em off early on, for no apparent reason. Always liked 'Sabatoge', didn't really 'get' the other hits. Then one day a couple weeks ago, I was at my friend's place when he showed me some instrumental jams of theirs and of course...Paul's Boutique.  They are gods.
I was already aware of this. Reading the article, and the way it repeatedly specifically mentioned Karzai even though there isn't evidence that he's in any way involved in anything like this makes me think that this is possibly not just badly written but a intentional hit piece. In any case: Pulitzer Prize my ass.
The win7 machine I'm talking about has 4gigs of ram and a fairly recent (2 year old) core 2 duo. Low end ATI Radeon 3450, but still.. I'm chalking it down to hardware incompatibility of some sort.
In my experience, Germans are unnecessarily polite to their neighbors.
There is nothing about this I get...help anyone?
Ah, you are the typical uninformed liberal, I suppose.   And all you can say is, Why Hell Yeah!  It's on now. Go watch the fool in chief.
I switched from Digg two years ago on my boyfriends account, I made my own so people would stop thinking he had a vagina. I felt bad when he'd talk all manly and people would be like "wtf... you JUST posted about menstrual cramping... and now you're talking about..." :)
I lived in Utah for a bit, there are even special organizations dedicated to helping these young men find a life outside of the cult.  They help them finish their education and get jobs as well as provide counseling to help them adapt.
is violentacrez here?
I don't think he was arguing.  But your response is pretty obvious that you already have your mind made up.
&gt;but how easy is it for non-nuclear countries to get their hands on natural uranium?  It is [everywhere](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Uranium#Occurrence) in the Earth's crust. The countries that currently produce it are just those that use it. Besides, Russia seems to be willing to sell to pretty much anyone.
I received this counterpoint the other day.  What would you say to someone who pointed out that the founding fathers had a [prayer](http://chaplain.house.gov/archive/continental.html) for the Continental Congress?
What's with that camouflaged door in the Oval Office? Does it lead to Obama's secret Muslim prayer room perhaps? Or maybe it's where he hides his real birth certificate? I DEMAND ANSWERS /s 
Blonde.
It's The Man in Black!
The [Tim Burton](http://fusedfilm.com/wp-content/uploads/2008/07/batmobile1.jpg) or [Bruce Timm](http://www.chickslovethecar.com/images//tas/tasbatmobile.jpg) models, certainly.  The Nolan Batmobile is an aesthetic abomination and I think the Adam West-era version is overdone.
Couldn't do that either. The real issue here is that the station has been neglected and run down for over a decade, the land wasn't properly registered, the institute that is responsible for it has been severely underfinanced, and as a result of all that the station has almost been lost. Not that the station needs to be sold and the only problem is to find a good owner.  As per the most recent news report on the situation, the auction has been postponed until the end of the official investigation and the current plan is to finally register the land with the station and possibly put it on the "cultural heritage" list, which would make the sale virtually impossible in the future. The best thing reddit can do therefore is continue to keep track of the issue, to make sure that the government follows through on its promises, since Russian (as all) media has a tendency to forget about stuff that happened more than a month ago.
in 1:05 the guy says that people can walk from Taiwan to Alaska...
Don't stick your dick in crazy.
Totally disingenuous headline. Likely it's validated for customers, and even if it's not it's not at all uncommon for LA. That's life in the big city for you, and I doubt any BofA's out in Boise or Laramie do this.  For the record BofA can die in a fire while choking on a bag of dicks, but this is still a bullshit post.
Yeah... I've noticed that it's impossible to debate most people as they get very defensive and act as if they've been personally attacked.
First, start out by doing all the quests.
The husk reminds me of Cell.
http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=0k5nY18XLhc&amp;feature=related  actually doesnt work apparently. a ken player trys that in that video^
Not much. The nook has a crappy rendering engine. I mean, it's really only designed to do one thing: show books. But you can't put something like that on the market and expect to move any units. It could be the best gorramed ereader on the planet, but no one would buy one.  tl;dr: don't use it, it's a "look what else it can do" feature.
This is still in hand.
LOl, you make a good point, but that was not my point. I was just giving more examples of "great new technologies" which adopt porn. That said, the first mainstream killer (no pun intended) application of AI and robotics is going to be sex toys / bots. We... uh... people will have mistress bots long before we have butler bots.
9,993,455 bottles of beer on the wall, 9,993,455 bottles of beer. Take one down and pass it around — 9,993,454 bottles of beer on the wall! 
Their basic premise is that you are more likely to get injured/killed in a physical confrontation if you fight back. They suggest that even if you are trained to fight back your risk of fighting off the attacker is only reduced by a small portion.   They further suggest that if you give the mugger / attacker what they want and walk away from the situation, you will be better off financially than if you pay for years of martial arts. Along with this they suggest that all martial arts cause injury to the students, while not always serious it is better to not take the risk.   They also suggest that even if you fight and win it is much better to not take on the financial liability of the attacker suing / pressing charges against you. They suggest that if you willing to fight an attacker you should use a gun in self defense and take the other person's life if you are faced with a situation of mortal peril, they preface this with them saying that they themselves could never take another human life and that it is a personal choice. 
do you really want to do that? think about it....
I have been trying to convince my GT alum friends to sell vuvuzelas outside the stadium before games. C'mon... Yellow Jackets... BZZZZZZZZZ
It be even cheaper in south east asia.  Your food bill will be half to 1/8th of what it is now, and your phone bills.  And real estate is cheap cheap cheap.  And it's a sunny place with easy access to beaches.  A one bedroom condo is like $20'000
When I was younger, I would have wondered if this culture could be fixed.  Now I realize that they will change on their own terms.  Incompatible cultures have to maintain their separation.  Keep off my lawn, I'll keep off yours.  Sucks to be an Afghan kid. Or woman.  Not my problem.
What are you talking about? Here in Canada reddit has been like a yo-yo since Sunday. Half of the time I was getting various HTTP 500 errors.  
You know I saw one similar to this, but this one comparing the Muslim population to the American one makes me want to perpetuate war in their countries until the two circles are more equal.  Just saying, from a straight numbers standpoint, we are **losing**.
damned it someone err everyone beat me to saying where the pict was taken at... failing ftw!
Bull Moose Party reference for you... &gt;http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Progressive_Party_%28United_States,_1912%29
[](/megusta "Now that's just exciting kinky play right there") ... Go on.
It's a random user name I've used for years. I got it from the Rolling Thunder bombing campaign in Vietnam. I was young and naive when I started using it. 
I AGREE!  That won't stop me from buying it however. 
Hipsters don't use clipless.
&gt;No, it's "There's something awful familiar about that logo..." with no bold.  Image alt text isn't meant to be marked up, it would take a lot of tweaking to make it do that and it would only work on like half the browsers around anyway.
KeSPA is dumb. In other news, the sky is blue.
Fair call sir, fair call.
&gt; it's not possible to make the site look as good in IE6 as it does in a modern browser  It is possible, but it requires momentous effort.
Why is this illegal?
The crushing weight of precedence and consumer expectations.
Which is true.  I had an appointment with someone that had a set from the 40's or 50's and were very dull.  They sent them in and got a new set sent to them because the knives were unsalvageable.
maybe he's not a faggot. maybe he's just an art student!
My eyesight is not great. To cut down on impulse purchases I sometimes leave my glasses at home when I go to the store. I know what I need and everything else is too blurry to tempt me.
[Go here and go over the checklist](http://www.tomshardware.com/forum/261145-31-perform-steps-posting-boot-video-problems)
Agreed. Making it more difficult to re-produce a simple tune does not make it sound better.
Hey, just a small point: &gt;I could always link you more Jefferson literature if you'd like. He's one of my favorite founding fathers.  John Q Adams is *generally* not considered a founding father.  He help shaped the formative years of our country, no doubt about that, but being born in 1767, he was only 10 when we declared independence.
Ba pula traznita! E ora 3:30 dimineata, te fut in gura daca nu termini cu zgomotele astea.  [Hey crazy dick! It is 3:30 in the morning, I will fuck you in the mouth if you don't stop with these noises.]
For the people who don't know why anyone would use this - I often screenshot my school schedule and set it as my wallpaper, or screenshot little things to show people later.
Info is info - temetics inevitably and ruthlessly eradicates false memetics.  Lying is a tactic that has a negative cost/benefit sum.
If I fighter doesn't make weight don't they take a percentage off the purse instead of cutting the bout?  I personally think that professionals will figure out pretty quickly that its better to have energy than a few extra pounds if weigh ins are scheduled the day of. 
If you have root, you should check out AdFree  edit: typo
I had that joke on vinyl
upboat for "contracting... a baby"
THEY CAME FROM ABOVE
If she really cared you would have a huge bulge. 
Dude, I'm not defending the governor or how many reacted to his statements and actions. I just tried to answer your question and explain the "connection".
Being far away from mommy.
I have now. Thank you.
Design is a big part of engineering.  Invention and theory are not the same.  The physicist comes up with the theory and the engineer invents it.
I'm always aware of the advantages that I got at birth.  I'm a cute, white, blonde woman.  I was born in a very racially diverse town in what's probably the most racially diverse state in the US., and I've had friends of other races all my life.  Those are all great advantages!
taekwondo 20+ years. Very effective. Was involved in one real nasty fight, attacked by two guys who turned out to be a gang of five, I snapped and went into auto-mode, and they were down and out in the shortest of time. We were in an enclosed space, which worked to my advantage as they could not attack me all together at the same time. I left with some big bruises but nothing that wouldn't heal in a couple of weeks. Must be honest though, this was an Asian country where the people on average are half my size. PS I hate fights. Always walk away. 
That is the best idea.  Usually I can see the owners of the off-leash pets.  Just brandishing that little tool properly would probably be enough in many cases.
Seize the moment of excited curiosity on any subject to solve your doubts; for if you let it pass, the desire may never return, and you may remain in ignorance. --William Wirt
The Tudors
I think he got it.
Wait...you have less page views than visitors? but how?
&gt;Not sure if it really works, that's what I read somewhere! &gt;Well the elevator I've used, it worked.  [](/wat)
WTF.  That's the stupidest thing I've ever heard.  Delete ≠ Archive.  If I want to keep something, I'll put it in a folder, TYVM.  Why the fuck would I delete something that I want to keep‽
The F-22 only costs so much because of how our government procures new weapon systems. When Congress cut the number of F-22s it wanted produced, the cost of each plane increased exponentially.  The R/D for this plane was astronomical, which was to be offset by the high number of planes in production.  Also, the F-35 is not a replacement for the F-22 (just like the F-16 is not a replacement for the F-15). They serve two completely differing roles.  The F-35 is meant to be a low-cost, modular, multi-force, coalition funded airframe. In which the same general components can be stocked by multiple nations, lowering the cost of maintenance, because damn near anywhere a plane is landed the parts to fix it will be there. Also, its flexibility and adaptability in combat will be of use to commanders. For instance, there are 4 Navy F-35s on a carrier (equipped with carrier hooks), but shit's popping in this area and the Marines could use a few VTOL aircraft. A few weeks downtime and the right parts, those Navy F-35s can be converted (that is, if the weight issues with the Marine's VTOL F-35 get straightened out - last I heard it was damn near going to be scrapped).
They did take that plane down a few years ago. We should have listened to their squaking.
http://instantrimshot.com/
It's pretty much a tradition that I buy new glasses when I visit Korea now. They're probably around $40.
homercles cares not for beans!
Yes it is...
It's great that you have the rest of your life completely figured out, but shit happens.  But based on how you've been responding to the answers posted here, it sounds like you've already made up your mind about closing the accounts and nothing we say is going to influence you otherwise. Go ahead and close them.
This is just fucking horrible.  I can't read any more after the electricity.  It's too much for me.  I can't wait to run for president.
But did you do it well?
Benzaldehyde all the way. 
Reddit will accept many things. But if we draw the line at zombies.  **DOWNVOTE THE UNDEAD** 
A reddit without Digg.
Phi Tau? I'm a brother there (though graduated) and it was always a blast meeting the thru-hikers we let stay at the house.  Congrats on finishing--hiking the AT is something I've always wanted to do...guess I may have to "settle" for hiking mountains in the west!
Pull over and hit that LIKE A BOSS. 
In everyone's life, at some time, our inner fire goes out. It is then burst into flame by an encounter with another human being. We should all be thankful for those people who rekindle the inner spirit. -Albert Schweitzer
You have a way with words, sir.
I like this.  Highly relevant to my interests.  Would upboat again.
... fatties. keep it OG.
Just as no one will pick your grapes for you, no one will tell your jokes for you.  -dave foley
It looks like some kid got a copy of UDK and pestered GameTrailers enough to get a game page with the video put up on their site. 
WTH does logic have to do with pricing? It does not work like that. You have clearly not had to price something before.  If some things are too cheap, people will think they are too cheap, and not waste their money.  If some thing are too expensive, then people will not justify the price.  There is no logic to it at all.
Where did that happen?
&gt;My homework asked me  ftfy
It's come to an even more bizarre extreme down here in Australia where the major supermarkets have done deals with the gas stations to offer you a discount on gas if you spend more than a certain amount on your groceries at X brand supermarket.   And it works - people will literally spend $10 more on groceries, then drive miles out of their way to find a participating gas station, all to save about 60c on filling up on gas. 
Maybe they did, maybe they didn't.  No idea.
Modern churches are often far removed from the literal word of the bible, and I will invoke the infinitive and say this is always for the better. I can easily respect the positive social contributions of a group of people, even if the nucleus of that group is something I don't respect. The actions of any group are likely to be relevant and interesting beyond the impetus of the group.
All you'll do is convince him he needs to park even shittier so nobody does that again. On accident.
I still don't understand why you blame Monsanto for this when you ought to be blaming a government that creates such a moral hazard.  Government has the veto power, not Monsanto.
Hearing neighbors having sex is hot.  Unless you know what they look like, and they are fat, or ugly, or both.  Unless you're into that.
Holy moley that was a quick reply. I can see what you are saying but sometimes food is such a chore to me.
its a bit of a vicious cycle.  women dropping their gender roles (traditionally only ~30% worked outside the home) has been the single largest contributor to the steady drop in wages thats been happening since the early 70s increase the supply of labour without an off setting increase in demand, wages drop, now two incomes struggle to do what one once could, and the family misses out on the services once provided by full-time homemakers.  id rather take a step back in time, have a little more weight on my shoulders as the sole bread winner, but have all those old benefits of homemakers
The way it works is, once you realize that a comment is from NonsensicalAnalogy without having to look at his name, you get to friend him. Not a second before.
I keep hearing that too...  friggin whiners.  All I hear is about how bad the camping is.  What I can't figure out is what the problem is.  IRL do you just run aimlessly into a gun battles?  If you do... excellent.  We could use less dumb shits on this planet.   I have x41 Turtle Beach Headphones and SitRep Pro.  I am not camping... I can actually hear you and don't feel like running headlong into your full metal volley.
You guys realize that with most modern browsers, you can right-click on the back button and select a page in your history (in this case, Reddit) to bypass that, right?  If you own a Mac, though, your only real option is to set your computer on fire.
I was woken in the middle of the night by this(along with my cat actually peeing in my mouth).
Anal sex.
Upvote for The Room reference.
I can't imagine the pain of being on the receiving end of that.
lets compare apples to apples here.  you dont think a video of a girl throwing live human babies into a river would get a similar reaction? 
BOOM! HEADSHOT!
ZING!
They seem to be joyful in their disregard of history, facts, reality and science. I realize that they prey on the stupid people for the sake of power, money and posturing, but they've taken it to such a degenerate level that the stupid people just suck it up like candy. It's depressing.
&gt;Tips: Experiment with how many times and how hard you squeeze the bottle.  I didn't read the title of that and thought it was a summary. 
Please don't misunderstand: I do know (not from first hand experience, but from having good friends involved over decades in international aid work in many countries including Haiti) how overwhelming it can be when immediate disaster piles on top of longterm underdevelopment. I am filled with admiration for every one of you who steps up to do this work.  But I also know that ripoffs like the one you describe -- and others on a much bigger, more cruel scale -- are the reason long-term aid workers sometimes seem coldly abstracted in their insistence on systems and priorities. I hope the hospital you worked at has been able to prioritize security on the life-saving drugs, and that your testimony about the *whole* of your experience there inspires others to take a turn at such critical volunteer work.  If you ever hear any more about the individual American who betrayed all the other volunteers, please do a follow-up. I hate to think what he might do next, leveraging a sanitized version of his "heroic" service in Haiti ...  
Stereophonics, Moby, Dandy Warhols, Chameleons UK, The Waterboys
just so we're clear, Fox didn't give the Democrats any money. People pissed about Fox giving the Republicans a million dollars have almost matched said donation.
Not aww at all. Why would I ever want to see this?
A well trained deep tissue therapist or neuromuscular therapist knows about nerve impingement and compression, when therapy is contraindicated for it, and how to help treat it when it IS indicated.  Granted, most massage therapists are fluffy spa workers who just do some swedish while you have cucumbers over your eyes and a glass of wine. There are a lot of us, however, who concentrate on musculoskeletal disorders and understand the dangers of manipulating soft tissues.
I used to hate lasagna when i was a kid. I was pretty stupid.
I agree with you 110%,  You don't have to be a racist to see the difference between Netherlands and California.
You still go eating at restaurants. (Just to further your point).
Love will make me lie blindly and believe it. When you're in love, they always have the best dick, and are always the best lovers. It's when you don't have the all consuming affection, that the question becomes trickier.
Yep, that's why I find it funny when people say they don't like the interface. I have a heavily configured opera that would be impossible to setup in any other browser
[Relevant](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=iwyC2PW3vc8)
I got this, but it never occurred to me how easily it can be used for so many things. Oh boy, I'm gonna have fucking field trip with "THE GENTLEMAN IS CORRECT IN ______!"
&gt;I don't think nationality would have any weight on his decisions   You're right, I missed your point.  I agree with your premise.
Because Americans are already fat enough
Are we still talking about tennis, or have we moved on to porn?
Yeah, where's its umbrella?
This is the right question to ask. Outlook needs pop3 or imap to work.
i thought it looked like a girl because of that cage.
It's not horseshit, it's realistic. The two parties are similar on almost every issue, except for a few that don't really matter, which they then argue loudly about. Both parties are for the federal reserve? check. Both parties are for war? check. Both parties are for increased government power? check. Both parties are for israel? check. Both parties are for spying on americans? check. Come on, give me a break. If ANY of those are "my" issue, and I want to vote to change it, there is effectively no party I can vote for. That's fucking bullshit, okay? Yes, I vote in every election. Too bad the electoral college changes my vote.
Who else just logged out?
Monaco 12 here, with anti-aliasing. In TextMate, light text on dark background.  Perfect.
NAPS
What I've really enjoyed so far about raiding with you guys is, if we wipe everyone DOESN'T flip out.  Thank you for that, it's very nice to have a good time and not have to worry about being yelled at for being a squishy mage.  :)  
You're doing the job you went to college for.  She's waiting tables.  She can either deal with the LDR, or wait tables where you live.  Sounds like she's choosing neither.
lol hell no, she'd wind up keeping the job just to do the opposite of what that asshole says
I can confirm this.
*We wants it, we needs it. Must have the precious. They stole it from us. Sneaky little hobbitses. Wicked, tricksy, false!* 
At least they look friendly
isn't that how everyone does it?
doctors say you're not supposed to put anything smaller than an elbow in your ear.
And not Alanis Morissette ironic either.
During Ancient Greek times the term "rape" did mean what abduction means today - only because forcible coition wasn't quite a concept.
Macross.
I hate you.
I think that enough happened in season 8 to satisfy me. I felt that everything was wrapped up fine.  With all of the new characters, I liked them in season 8 because a) they did not take away from the main cast and b) they gave a feeling of Sacred Heart still continuing, and stuff still happening in the context. Actually having to see it in season 9 killed me, though.
I hate this so much.
They absolutely are. I'm seeing for the second time this year next month. 
I think:   * #1 (black background) would be very bold on reddit considering its mostly white theme.   * #2 goes bold retro in a good way  * #3 combines many great aspects including meme-worthy, reddit alien, and eye catching design.   * #4 is nice in a minimalist sort of way with a hint of alien and a pin striped suit * #5 just doesn't work for me:  Too orangered or something.   * #6 I think is great for a new look, very unique, very bold.   * #7 makes me want to trace around the maze around the alien and maybe that just catches my interest but it could be universal.  It caught my eye.   * #8 is like the beautiful subdued girlfriend.  Hotter than hell but sitting in the corner reading a book you'll never understand.  But waiting.   * #9 though it doesn't use new colors it puts them together in a way that one doesn't often see on reddit.  This could work well because it's like seeing a dude sleep with a horse.  Sure, it happens, but when you actually _see it_ you can't help but look.   If I were simon cowell and these were my bitches of the night and we were in the showcase showdown and the top 100 answers were on the board I'd have to choose as my favorite to see on a daily basis...  *back after these messages from our sponsor*  **and we're back!**  We've narrowed the field to 6, 7, and 8.  Who will make the final round?  tune in next week, same bat time, same bat channel, to find out who takes home the toaster! ...or something like that.
Wake me up when someone adds Outlook notes &amp; tasks sync...   :)
Try a different browser; I use XScope, and copy and paste functionality is built in and pretty east to use.  Good luck!
How many extra people do you think you'll need? 2?
You're fine. Relax. I bet it will be delicious
Yeah, this is actually the pocket gun I mentioned. And it's fantastic, the perfect size for pocket carry.  But like you say, carry often and shoot occasionally. I'm looking for something a little bigger to carry on my hip when clothing permits... and to shoot all the time. But they can pry the Rohrbaugh from my cold, dead hands. I love that thing, and I'm not getting rid of it.  Head over to [here](http://www.rohrbaughforum.com) and do some reading if you're serious about getting one. Which I recommend doing, if that wasn't clear enough already :)
1g -- gravity at sea level. 
Your google-fu is broken.  /link sux
Mine was pretty good, but I was amazed how up-to-date it was as well.  Not the same when there's a big ass RV in the driveway.
Same problem here. Both in chrome and firefox.
Welcome to the real world son.
The people filming nearly ran into the whales a number of times. No idea what their thought process was... "Hey lets get so close that we ram the dying whale, that way we can get a better look!!!111" Sigh.
That's right. Everybody is into not liking what other people like.
Accountants, what? Engineers?  As for the others, in what way do they have status other than someone saying "Ooh, you're a doctor, wow?" and then moving on? Being a doctor or a professor doesn't get you into super exclusive social venues. I come from a family that includes all the professions I named (along with authors, high-end pro musicians, scientists, etc.), and all I can think of in terms of status granted is the 'wow' factor. After the initial reaction, you get treated like everyone else.   That said, I'd suggest that someone living ultra simply might enjoy a similar sort of status in that they are fun to have at cocktail parties because they'll have cool stories to tell.
Yeah I agree, total weight loss percentage should be how the winner is determine, it's the only fair way.
You were in a lose-lose situation. If you'd have gone up to her when her ex was trying to drag her away, you'd have looked beta, to his alpha. If you let him take her, you're beta. She arranged this. That's why she got so drunk, so she could claim it was a mistake. But it was obviously a "mistake" she was planning all along, that's why she was acting weird. 
So do I. Deciding who's paying is always the most awkward part. 
Surprised Californication and Entourage hadn't been mentioned before now. Around these parts we don't have a designated driver.  We have a Turtle.
how could they forget it??  I image means nothing without it
Yes of course, I knew that. But I don't have to pay a 'bill'. Like I get for an ambo ride. That should also come out of property &amp; city taxes in MHO
This is an awesome shot, kudos to you sir.
CM6 runs great on my Droid. Battery life is incredible. I could go almost two days with out needing to charge.
You don't get any karma for self posts.
It's apparently already been posted in [/r/worldnews](http://www.reddit.com/r/worldnews/comments/d7xcq/bbc_news_obama_hails_end_to_us_combat_operations/), but I think it belongs here.
Touche
I have been member of digg since 2006 and now I made my first account in reddit. I don't tolerate digg anymore. Btw I'm looking more for programming articles and I would like a better user interface on this page, but so far I will stay here, is better than the crappy new digg....
You have given me hope, sir. I'm 27 and my goatee section comes in pretty dense but my cheeks are scant. I long for the day when I can grow a mountain man beard and let out a hearty chuckle whilst I chop wood and make love simultaneously.
7 or 8 years ago I would think your pathetic but now I think your lucky.  
I am just trying to bring some transparency to the issue. All Reddit reports is build the mosque, build the mosque!  There is another side to the argument whether you believe their reasons are legitimate or not. A lot of 9/11 families are against this and I think their opinion, like the man in your video, is more important than any politician or Reddit user.
You don't think guro stands out?
You can always get breast reduction surgery 
Read what "they" don't want you to read! http://www.thebirdman.org/ Listen to what "they" don't want you to listen to! http://reasonradionetwork.com/ Laugh at what "they" don't want you to laugh at! http://stuffblackpeopledontlike.blogspot.com/ Discuss what "they" don't want you to discuss! http://www.thephora.net 
I read this as "take a picture of a crap"
They have to do *something* with their time.
NOT FALLING FOR IT BUSTER
Don't worry..., you still have brain cells. It's when you continue the conversation that you begin to lose them. It would be like me having a converstation about politics with my brother. He still thinks Sarah Paling is brilliant. I will never change his mind, so why bother. I just let him continue to bathe in his ignorance as you should with people like this. :)
ಠ_ಠ
Jesus dude, stop trying to sensationalize this.  This isn't about employment, it is about reasonable accomodations.  The guy hired them, and then after they were hired, refused to give them special treatment.  Why do you have such a hard time with this.  There is NO indication from this article that anyone else received special treatment based on their religious practices.  Until that is demonstrated by you, you have no grounds to accuse this company of ANY wrongdoing.
I was into them before they got fossilized!
I want my socks knocked off that night!! ;)
I think if you get Classic Dungeonmaster (or whatever the Vanilla dungeon achieve is) and Explorer/Loremaster of Kalimdor/Eastern Kingdoms you should be pretty safe.
not that I have any penchant for defending banks. but this might be an isolated incident. I used to work at a store in Hollywood that had a shared parking lot, really expensive real estate. but not every store in the company had that policy. from my experience I bet it varies on location and the bank has nothing to do with it.
&gt; Sorry but IP rights are net harmful.  I agree that IP laws in their current state are suboptimal, but the concept of IP rights isn't necessarily harmful. I'm oversimplifying, but I think of it as a curve with a maximum above zero (being defined as whatever economic benefit society receives in a system with zero IP rights), but where the current state of IP law leaves us below zero somewhere to the right of that maximum.  I hope that made sense in paragraph form. If not, I'll fire up some software and upload what I mean to imgur. 
A lot of people actually do tune their drums to a specific pitch, including the snare. It helps me remember a tuning I like sometiimes if I find a real good one for what I'm doin at the time
Gameboy Advanced Emulator asks for bios, how do I get this to work?
I don't know what browsers you all are using, but try something for me:  go to one of those sites, and right-click on the back button.
yeah total rip off http://www.thatsphucked.com/PhuckedImages/Sexy%20Girls/three%20breasts.jpg lots of boobs = original
I guess it depends on the reasons why you want to step back. Is it because you don't want to marry this person, ever? Or do you just want more time to think about it? Or are you just not interested in having the title, and are content to be boyfriend/girlfriend forever?  If you just need more time, it's fine. If you think that this person isn't marriage material, then I'd question why you want to continue the relationship at all- you're wasting both of your time, especially if the other person does think it's heading towards marriage. If you've decided simply that you don't think that marriage as an institution is worthwhile, as long as your partner is on board, it's fine.
How many people does orangered need?
I organized a lynch mob to come after you and the mob did this as well.
*crickets* 
One day, after shaving my junk, I got out of the shower and naturally wanted to put some lotion on my tender bits to reduce irritation.  I couldn't find the normal stuff, just a bottle of foot lotion.  Like most foot lotion, it was pretty loaded on peppermint oil.  Fuck everything about that.
Glenn Beck is a lying asshole. Fuck him and everyone who supports and believes his horseshit.
:x burn
Crystalline Sliver is the best option for protecting your slivers.  That said, this is not even remotely viable as a Legacy deck.
I do this every time I have a procedure. Even with my last Upper Endoscopy I wrote not this arm/leg allover my body. Medical error happens all the time
Let's go get another one! Certainly when he gave me the first one he wasn't trying to send me a message...
Golly this minimum 51% real steak tastes funny. I wonder why. 
i'm going to find u and kill u
Well it's *slightly* different this year considering he's an UFA... though yeah he does usually skate with the team.
He did fulfill them.  He brought them to their intended completion.  Can we debate something that isn't common knowledge?
No, Kenny! It doesn't go "pew pew" it goes "bang bang!"
Maybe you should find a goal in life. Life can be about making that GPA and having good friends. But cheesy at it is - the people who end up getting the GPA and the good life are the ones who actually have big dreams. Getting good grades and having lots of friends is just an afterthought or not even factored into the equation.  Ask yourself what you want in life. Is it just a good gpa with some friends? or maybe something else?
That sounds like a fantastic show overall.
were ya callin' from a walky talky?
hahaha, we knew that was gonna happen.  We are srs though.
he's cold
I am only seeing 5 seasons of greatness relative to his time: '76, '77-'79, and '85. The Gold Gloves are impressive, but I have to vote "no".
Snopes to the rescue! I fucking love that site and use it all of the time when people send me stupid shit.
No it will have a model name, for example 600m. So just to double check. Also I would not share my product numbers with the internet.
?
That's awesome, and even better you've alerted me to r/homebrewing! 
Really?  Because I can download almost any ebook for free as it is.  And I'd gladly pay a reasonable amount (a dollar or two for sure) for something that's guaranteed to be complete and have good metadata, cover art, and delivered to the reader device of my choice.  The point that they're trivially small makes automatic delivery to a mobile device over a cell data network even more reasonable. So.  Let me log on to your site with my desktop, clicky a few times, order five books, pay ten or fifteen dollars, and have them on my eink reader or phone or whatever by the time I get to the airport and I'll love you long time.
pkill deja
YOU GONNA GET RAPED
Here is the response, Im not exactly sure of what it means   &gt;rst.x476.rs.dns-oarc.net.  &gt; rst.x485.x476.rs.dns-oarc.net.  &gt; rst.x490.x485.x476.rs.dns-oarc.net.  &gt; "208.x.x.x DNS reply size limit is at least 490"  &gt; "208.x.x.x lacks EDNS, defaults to 512"  &gt; "Tested at 2010-09-01 00:04:19 UTC"   Though on my linode without any slowdowns I get this  &gt; rst.x3827.rs.dns-oarc.net.  &gt; rst.x3837.x3827.rs.dns-oarc.net.  &gt; rst.x3843.x3837.x3827.rs.dns-oarc.net.  &gt; "97.107.138.191 DNS reply size limit is at least 3843"  &gt; "Tested at 2010-09-01 00:07:49 UTC"  &gt; "97.107.138.191 sent EDNS buffer size 4096"   As for your other questions, its a hosted VPS, so I don't really have answers to these questions.  
She has the right, as long as she can assume consequences. If you do without letting your bf know, then get pregnant, he will feel betrayed and disgusted by what you did and might deny it's from him, then you'll be stuck as single mom.
I went vegan before I heard of PETA. I just recently watched those videos and reaffirmed my commitment.
she was 15 in Apr 2009 so less than 2 years wait for you now
[](/pissed "fine, miss the concert and the girl and whine more about it and be a douche to everyone trying to help, geez")
Mother cats sometimes leave their kittens to go hunt.  Where did you find them?
No matter what controller I'm using, I'll always call the buttons Δ, O, X, □.  It's a bad habit when you're playing an Xbox and a message says "Press B to interact." I'm like "which one's B?"
They're just startled and saying the first thing that comes out of their mouths.  ;-)  They don't consider it an insult, which "Wow!  You're fat!" would be.
Once, I rolled up the top layer of skin on my hand into a ball by doing that. It hurt bad enough that I remember it 10+ years later D:
Is he trying to commit suicide, or is he pulling a David Carradine?
He built a time machine.
Do you like Barbara Streisand ?
* I have been diagnosed as depressive, going on 10 years now. The best medicine is exercise. 30 minute run is better than any drug doctors have prescribed me * Weed in VERY little moderation, i.e. a bit once a week * Eating good. Even depressed, if I eat good it's a lot less impactful than if I've been eating crap
My first stroke, eh?  Everything went better than expected.
Bank of America fucking blows. I don't even like taking checks from their customers because I feel that I'm somehow contributing to the corruption.
I would love this.
Haiti doesn't recognize the patents anyways, it's not like Monsanto could do anything about it anyways in Haiti.
The only possibility that I'm aware of would be to find a patch of the exact same fabric and patch it, though it's going to be obvious that you patched it, especially somewhere like a collar.   You could probably use some sort of ink if it's a solid colored shirt, but again, you're dealing with a prominent part of the shirt, so unless the ink you use has the exact sheen and shade as the dye used for the shirt, it's going to immediately be obvious when light hits it. 
[](/troll "I meant, it did work on my elevator, I'm not SURE it works, because I could have just gotten lucky on every try.")
Iran is a barbaric country - Ms. Bruni had best keep a watchful eye
Full retard gets me everytime. lmao
....um, yes please, "Go on." You brought it up, so you have to tell this story. That bro seems like he'd be a blast to light one up with.
Yes, product lifecycle benefits often come in the license, but if they never actually use the product, it's moot.  The purchaser would be better off selling their license to another user at a discount.  Of course, that's not possible in the current market.  
Yeah it actually really sucks because I won't ever be able allowed to drive with my eyesight.
Except this isn't just women.  It's men too.  Westernized humans are self-serving.
To crush your enemies, to see them driven before you, and to hear the lamentations of their women. 
Yes, but did you see how the other group did *nothing*?  A more fair test would have been to have the other group watch TV, read a book, play Pac-Man. To me this says, "If you sit around for 10 minutes with nothing to do but think about something traumatic, you will have a difficult time forgetting it later."
play through SC2 single player
Gay people are icky!!!
When people are at the same place at the same time talking about the same things in agreement and collusion, it can't be considered a strange tenuous link.
"Someone may beat me, but they're going to have to bleed to do it." - Steve Prefontaine
They've been courting prospects since Adelson stepped down. Rose has said from the beginning he wasn't in it long-term. Non-news.
It's under [community settings](http://www.reddit.com/r/firstpage/about/edit/)&gt;Content Options&gt;Text Posts Only.  This removes the link tab without having to tweak the CSS. :)
u mad, bro? [](/rtroll)
i ran store, ate food snack dinner
[r/android](http://www.reddit.com/r/android "mayhaps?")?
I find that they're a lot cheaper on Amazon! :) 
[The Daily Show](http://www.thedailyshow.com/watch/wed-august-25-2010/tennessee-no-evil) did a pretty funny 'investigative report' on the issue. (jump to 4:40 for the Nashville part)
I like it how he only collects straws.  Wonder what he will make with them...
So true.. I'll be Big Girl around other people, then :)
Very informative, and kinda what I figured. Fat stores provide some energy to keep you going for a few days, but you'd die from missing dietary elements (amino acids, glucose, etc as you mentioned) before you burned off all of the reserves. 
There are so many lies told about us to advance the cause of distrust and hatred against us, that it can be very easy for us to misinterpret these kinds of questions as attacks. Because, frankly, frequently they are.  Personally, I didn't get that vibe from you.
Just last night I was wondering where all the wildfires on the West Coast went
I would argue that new belgium and Sam Adams occupy much lower spots.  Which is why I am confused that you put Rogue in there, because it is obviously delicious and unique.
FAKE!  That guy is running on a road with no yellow lines when the road in Street View has yellow lines.
When you have a chance I would love you to creepy script crawl me.  I promise to be your reddit groupie forever afterwards (or at least until I get bored).
I watch Adult Swim videos in bed all the time. Works well.
I was told the same, which is why I checked to make sure it really was in neutral.
Smooth indeed!
hell yea
I have friends who live there. Call bullshit if you want, doesn't bother me.
That is NO fun.  In reference to the above article.....You should have your big brother stand in the OR with a shotgun to deter those med students/organ harvesters.
&gt;Actually im pretty sure that phrase showed up on MND  It's abundantly clear you are full of shit, as you continue to lie.  And by the way, the article on the tea parties was written by me, and it was an attack on the republicans for co opting them, and for using them (with the help of Glen Beck) to funnel votes to the republican party.  Did you even read it or are you just making up EVERYTHING as you go along?  You still have not anted up.  Your challenge here, as you seem to have forgotten was to prove your point that "for every good artilcle...blah, blah, blah, dripping with hate, blah, blah, blah.  What a fail.
I was expecting [the los angeles river](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/File:MTA_los_angeles_river.jpg)
I was thinking that maybe we should create individual reddit threads for each of the headings in the FAQ and then link to those. My reasoning is this: * The FAQ is kind of overwhelming right now and breaking it down to one question with an answer thread might be a bit easier. * If the thread was restricted to just answers and off-tangent discussion was forbidden it would allow for the best resources to rise to the top in true reddit form.
im with you guys on this one, different nation+ celebrity status=lighter sentence that doesnt make it right, and despite the sentencing disparity i am happy this guy is in jail
It's only 40 feet down, which means that even my weenie SCUBA cert would let me go down. What an awesome vacation idea.
For one thing, they don't have Guardian. A lack of anti-cheat software completely ruined the server I played on when I did privates. 
fuggin love this song
maybe I'm just lucky it is the real McCoy.
this idea could go way harder
sadly, there is nothing you can do about it.  take it in the rear and pay more.  M$ is not blizzard.  They don't give a rats ass really.  A lot of 360 users don't pay the yearly bill.  Either they are given a time card for a year or parents shell out the paltry amount of cash a year to pay for it.  Now the $15 price tag on stupid DLC is another issue all together.  And if MW2's packs are any indication of how the 360 community can rise up be prepared for nothing being changed.
A 5 oz. bird cannot carry a one pound coconut.
I'm kind of happy playing nonsensical analogy roulette
[](/troll)  no problems?
Well, I had a pretty low gauge prince albert piercing prior to this (which was fun for a while), but I got tired of it, so I took it out.  This left me with a hole on the underside of my penis.  The novelty of peeing out of two holes was fun for a while, but it got old quickly, so I decided to just turn it back into one hole again.  The modification itself is really fun.  It opens up a lot of nice feeling nerve endings, and gives your SO a fun place to lick when she's down there ;).  Overall, it's been very positive for me.
I agree, and suppose it's pretty inane to rub my own beliefs in her face, simply considering the age rift. My parents aren't native English speakers and were raised in the former Soviet Union, so that undoubtedly has an effect as well. Perspective is a tricky thing.  In regards to education, she almost didn't let me take the U.S. Government class in high school because she was afraid it would "brainwash" me. I did take it, and my views did take a 180 because I was exposed to more than just FOX. She now uses that to "prove her point" that the educational system is just out to brainwash students into the "liberal agenda."   That's just a little bit of context. Given that, maybe you (and the minority) are right -- what use would it be to present her with what amounts to a list of quotes?   I'm glad rational discussion worked for you, for the most part... but it seems as if my folks' fears are just as ridiculous as the views they hold. They're afraid of the US becoming a socialist nation. They're afraid of "the gays" taking over the US. There's no way I can even humor that.  Don't get me wrong; I love my parents and greatly value what they do for me. There's just a massive rift in our beliefs that's idealistic to consider ever changing, but still kind of nice to think about. 
Hang a sign on the tree saying "I am not a pervert."
361 is not a round number...but it is a square.  (19)^2 = 361.  
&gt; Almost everything but networking.  Oh, and the only other thing the OP was actually complaining about, GUI libs.
Ya they got her a couple of days later going to the gym like nothing had happened.
I would think the pepper spray being sprayed into your eyes would be a fair deterrent. If I were carrying pepper spray I would begin spraying it as soon as it was pointed in your general direction. I wouldn't warn you.   Even if I couldn't hit you the burning sensation of even being near the spray should be enough to dissuade most attackers. 
It's pretty easy in Los Angeles, everyone know's where the ocean generally is, and based on the sun, you can pretty much figure it out.
Yes we can call reddit. the number is 8675309, 24/7 356 someone is waiting for you to call. Call now, Call often. 
Pancho Villa Lives!
What in the hell kind of headline is this?  There is no evidence whatsoever to suggest this is anything other than simple vandalism.  There is nothing in the article about a shoot out, or a car chase.  Nowhere does it mention Glenn Beck or, any involved party's political affiliation.
What kind of pour is that?  **ಠ_ಠ**
If you are on OSX, you can use command-shift-4 to bring up a crop tool that lets you take a screenshot of only part of your screen. You can also use command-shift-*option*-4 to bring up the crop tool and save the screenshot to your clipboard. Then you can paste the image into a graphics program, word, some email clients, etc.
Seems like an obvious way of demonstrating their ability to provide a media streaming service, possibly tied to a new AppleTV.
Good for you. I'm not exactly sure what being a National Merit Scholar is, since I'm Canadian and we don't write all the fancy tests that you Americans do. I did, however, leave high school with a 90.5% average and got precisely zero scholarship money.
Of course she does but it's a dick move
It's not that simple.  Men who negotiate hard are perceived as strong.  Women who negotiate hard are perceived as bitches.  (I wish I could remember what article this was in.)
That group is called reddit.
&gt; lol Steve Holt!
Boo (a .NET language) e.g. does not allow re-typing, unless you explicitly declare the type as 'duck'.  The non-duck variables allow faster code in the virtual machine.  Of course, the point isn't the compiler; it's the human reader.  But whatever works for you is fine.
okay, thank you
I think it's an interesting thing to consider the impact Tiger Woods has had on Federers fame. TW casts a large shadow, especially before these past 2 years.
ShadyJane, thank you. I laughed out loud, read this to my wife, and we laughed out loud together.  This is precisely why I love you, Reddit.
Urdu/Hindi.   Dog: bhuoo bhuoo  Cat: miaoon miaoon (soft N)  Small bird (chick, sparrow, etc.): choon (soft N)  Donkey: dheenchoon dheenchoon (all Ns are soft). Weird? Sure.   Rooster: kukroon koon (soft N; detect a pattern yet?)  Most other animals don't have onomatopoeias for their sounds. Horses always just neigh ("hin hinaanaa") and lions just roar ("dhaar"). 
Smith&amp;Wesson makes an airweight 12oz M&amp;P model 360 357 revolver (I have one). I load it with 38+P because it's easier to get accurate follow up shots vs 357. I do load my Ruger GP100 4" with 357 since it's a 45oz beast.   I also, on occasion, carry a Walther PPS in .40cal - sometimes a Colt .380 as a backup gun. 
Atleast now you'll be well versed in military history..
I shouldn't have to change the type of game play I prefer because the game physics are incorrect.
You're obviously clueless about men.  Stop going to their house.   Stop accepting rides in their car.   Stop hanging out with guys who are twice your age.  Why would they want to be "friends" with a teenage girl?   Make some female friends. Get a clue.
Yes. I understood that. The thing is, you were wrong. :D
Good on em'. (Haitians)
Don't forget to double tap and keep on running.
You sir, are genuinely awesome.
So what exactly is it? Apparently my google chrome is outdated; all Ive seen is some guy running and irritating pop ups showing up; I assume google street view data is used to create the surroundings?  This could be interesting in a porn movie, but here, well it takes 3 minutes of some guy running and nothing happens.
&gt; Dinosaurs and the Universe are twice as awesome now!  [](/lol)
over 9000  15mph
Make a gourmet mudpie. My recipe:  Layer1 (bottom): coarsely crushed oreos.  Layer2: Dulce De Leche (or caramel, but dulce de leche is better)  Layer3: Chocolate pudding.  Layer4: Chocolate pudding mixed with an equal amount of whipped cream (makes it lighter in color and taste)  Layer5: More chocolate pudding.  Top layer: finely crushed oreos, gummi worms, and chocolate rocks if you can find them.
Here is my #1 guitar.  52 Reissue Tele with modern electronics kit applied, white pickguard, and minor bridge improvements: http://imgur.com/2c8Ge.jpg
Completely unrelated but what the hell happened at digg that a revolt was the only option? I'm asking since your username and the fact that you've been a redditor for 4 days means you might know.   Preemptive -&gt; I'm in grad school so yes I have been living under a rock/in a cave/in wyoming(not really but they have a seriously low population density).
techky
Girls. 
Haha...this is great! Also, I think in the last one, makkelouda literally translates to "mother's penis" which is even more hilarious. 
those shopping carts look really fucking tempting...
What did your wife safe when you guys first broke up?   How is your marriage now?   How long have you been together?   This is promising.. 
Is it Mega-Maid? Is she set to suck or blow?
It saddens and worries me too. Not every team gets the chance to do ride-outs with Pat.   TBH I live in fear that myself or someone I know will have a bad reaction to the trees and get shot...
I agree, I just think it's a sad sign that Reddit is losing its sense of humor within its much stronger sense of smug.
oohhh or Mass Effect 2
That's not the correct meaning of a precursor, but I can't see that being the case either way. I don't really understand why you'd cut cocaine with it either baking soda is what's normally used and it's much cheaper I'm sure.
Upvote for you. Would love to see the original.
I don't use Greasemonkey for anything else, so I'm probably doing something wrong, but my preferences for RES are wiped out every time I restart Firefox.  There are a few things I turn off, and I need to do that every time I restart Firefox. I have Firefox 3.6.8 and RES 1.7 (also had the same problem on RES 1.67), running on Windows 7.
All torrents hosted at Zomb.  Get an account if you don't already have one.  Site rocks.  [MKV 720p 4.11Gb](http://zombtracker.the-zomb.com/details.php?id=35997)  [MOV 720p 7.33Gb](http://zombtracker.the-zomb.com/details.php?id=35996)  [DVD-DL NTSC 480p 7.4 Gb](http://zombtracker.the-zomb.com/details.php?id=35955)  [DVD-DL PAL 480p 7.3 Gb](http://zombtracker.the-zomb.com/details.php?id=35954)
Nah, my RX-8 has been damned reliable, no flooding, no problems. Issues generally only get to people that don't understand the two "problems" - don't shut it off cold, and check the oil every fillup. There's not much to it.
That, and also we don't have capital punishment since 2002.
When I go on longer runs I have noticed my body getting chills sometimes, which I would think is what you were talking about. This however is more of a numb tingling sensation although now that I think my hands will feel mildly cool when this happens too. I will try and take notice of the coolness of my hands tomorrow.
I was completely unimpressed.... until the ending with the trees popping up everywhere... that was pretty sweet.
My first instinct reading that line was to implore him to spawn. We need more people like him influencing people.
Oh ok then. I can vouch for what your friend's mom told you. It's pretty good stuff actually.
"and varieties"
Ooops. I studied with a mixed bunch of Indians, and some were from Kerala and some were from all over the place.  My bad! I still like your language.
Check out Consider the Lobster.  I haven't read Infinite Jest either, but this collection made me fall in love with DFW (posthumously, unfortunately).
How do you know, bro? [](/troll)
in my experience, Canadians are the biggest assholes when they are driving.  I'm told this lessens the further west you go, though.
It also supports Hg, Perforce, ClearCase, etc etc.
I don't get this. I'd rather drink a PBR than a Coors Light or Bud Light. For a cheap domestic its far from the bottom of the barrel.
Thanks, it's a good answer. You earned the beer, I think.
Israel
Fun Fact: In half-life 2 and the episodes the SPAS-12 has a selective fire mode where it shoots two barrels but the SPAS has only one barrel. I think the programmers got confused and thought the extended tube was another barrel and the SPAS was an over under shotgun.
Oh wow, even if it had nothing to do with cannabis, this picture is fantastic. It's like something straight out of Lewis Carroll or Studio Ghibli. Gorgeous!
Sometimes when a person is starving they will try to eat rocks and wood because they suddenly seem appetizing.   Maybe digg left you hungry and you just found some wood and rocks.
**BAAAAAAZIIIINGAAAAAAAAAAAA!!!**
I would vote for breaking the nose of the owner instead of the dog. But I have far less patience for stupid humans than for animals who don't really know any better.  You could get animal pepper spray. I have some for when I go running with or without my pups. I've (luckily) never had to use it, but it's a good deterrent that doesn't do any permanent damage. 
Score one for the penniless freakshows!
My mistake. Hell of a game.
&gt;...and that they should stick to (god help me) Arial!  [You are way, waaaaaaaay too uptight if the minor differences on 10 characters total bother you that much.](http://imgur.com/bppCX.png) Or perhaps a douchebag.
So long, and thanks for all the fish!
I had a German girlfriend once, she gave me the clap.
How about, you man the fuck up and just be a god damned man. Act civil but be concise. Like a boss. 
Fuck.   You.
Where do you live?  IE near California coast, near some mountains, near Grand Canyon etc..?
You don't need to look at GDP to realize that we're in a Depression, my friend, now do you? :)  The approach to deduct public deficits is certainly a nice idea, but unfortunately completely arbitrary unless he provides some more reasoning (which maybe the author does and I'm just not seeing it).  In case you are interested in my measure of True GDP, maybe this will interest you http://www.economicsjunkie.com/true-gdp-q2-2010/  That being said, any measure of GDP is not very helpful in getting an idea as to what's really going. It's rather about figuring out which indicator sucks least :)
[His wiki is cited](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/David_Foster_Wallace#Themes_and_styles).  &gt;On the Charlie Rose show in 1997, Wallace claimed that the notes were used to disrupt the linearity of the narrative, to reflect his perception of reality without jumbling the entire structure. He suggested that he could have instead jumbled up the sentences, "but then no one would read it."  I was talking about some general stuff I've read about his style. And a video interview I found on reddit too. I'm not going to find that video again.
True. I did like season 8, just not as much... But yeah, "My Finale" wrapped everything up so well... once a friend of my told me about the new season, I refused to watch it
I cannot lie, that is a pretty good feeling.
I think we nailed it, guys!
I probably could. Only because i'm a giant food snob.
panaracer RiBMO Ride Yo Bike Mo
Your tireless work on getting Pluto the respect it deserves does not go unnoticed, my friend.   Fight the good fight!
Are they transferring Zordon's headquarters? Where will the power rangers teleport to?!
Link?
Hmm, I seem to be in the wrong place.  Which way to the social subreddit for us older, beer snob minnesotans? 
 Ents? What are they?   [6] who here thinks slushies are the greatest invention ever?
What's offensive about a flightless bird?  [boobies](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Booby)
Just the fact that there are three video ports but only two are usable kind of annoys me, although its not a feature I particularly need at the moment
So I'm going to say something that may get me down voted into hell.   I'm generally a fan of Google and they've done a lot of good, but they aren't a "product" company.  Google doesn't know how to build products in the same way Apple or even Microsoft does.   Instead Google has cool ideas and partially executes on them.  Then it seems like their Engineers get bored and move on to other stuff.  There are certainly exceptions to this (e.g. Maps and Chrome), but much of their stuff seems half-baked from a product perspective.  Even Gmail, which was brilliant in 2004, is now getting incredibly long in the tooth and suffering from new features being crudely bolted onto its interface.   Apple by contrast is clearly focused on the user's experience with their products - form doesn't simply follow function, form is an equal partner with function and so enhances it.  That doesn't make Apple perfect far from it, but the focus on "product" is clearly there.  For Google, important simple functionality is sometimes bizarrely missing for no discernable reason and "form" means nothing at all.   FWIW, I use Gmail exclusively, Google Calendar exclusively, use Chrome exclusively unless I want Firebug or Netflix, use Google Voice, prior to dropbox all my shared documents were Google Docs, and I just switched from iPhone to Samsung Galaxy S.  
After being essentially raped my first few years of college on textbooks that I couldn't sell back if they where the last books on earth I have used the following plan of action. It has not failed me yet. 1. Make sure you absolutely need the book for the class, after the third time I bought a book the Professor never used I was done. Always wait until the second week of class to purchase the book, so you know that you absolutely need it.   2. If you can find the text book online for cheap (and you can afford it) buy it online, proceed to highlight crap out of it for fun. Draw mutaches on the serious business pictures, if you must. If you can't, proceed to step 2. 3. Ask the professor if you can use the previous edition, most Professors have no control over the text book updates in their class. Most professors will also let you use the previous edition if it contains small changes (chapters moved around, different blurbs) but the core content remains the same. The old edition is always ultra cheap online used. If that is not the case . . .  4. Ask the Professor to put the book in the library for referance, this has not failed me. The Professor will always put a book on reserve if you ask, they get extras from the publisher. If the Professor refuses, use WorldCat from your school library home page to search for other area college that have the textbook. Sometimes you can do an inter library loan, or just go to the college and do your work there. However, this takes a few days as does getting a used copy mailed to you. So . . .  5. When you need to do readings/assignments the first week, the first chapter of a textbook will 95% of the time be available on the Publisher's website. If your college text book store is located in the college bookstore (a place with a cafe) go and "rent" the book for as much time as you need to take notes the first week. I usually just pick it up from the shelves, sit down with it and put it back when I'm finished. This way, I get my work done while waiting for used/old editions to be shipped or waiting on the professor to put the book in for referance. I do the vast majority of my work in a library in either way, so this method always worked for me since I was there anyway. I only had to visit another college's library one semester (I went 4 times) to read the book because it was on reserve and make copies. 
This is amazing.  I feel sorry for you ahead of time for the downvotes you'll receive,  but let it be known that hey, I like you.
pft.. vinyl is a fad, wax cylinders sound so much better
Well good luck with your firings!
Ahaha I bet endgadget/all the mico-blogging coverage are loving this  /s  Talk about Apple finally getting with the times. 
They could probably reissue the original *Now* under the nostalgia-grabbing *"Then"* or something.  And *Then 2* could be a reissue of  *Now 2*.  I don't think their target audience would notice. *Remember these hits, but don't remember buying them?!*  "YES!"
I am in the same boat. I've been lurking for about a year, and nothing ever moved me enough to comment or upvote anything until this. Viva Colbert!
No, they only fly in formation to honor America.
They were dividing by [zero](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BqgEm8XWXu8).
Sort of different for a webapp compared to a site that should have relatively 'static' content.
Hokusai has nothing on these guys.
I had an interview with Best Buy for a sales associate job last week. They didn't call me for a second interview and refused to return my follow up call. I thought the interview went perfect. :/   Do they have an interview quota or something? Or did I just fail that bad.
If you tire of private servers or don't agree with them, there are a few guilds which cap out at 60 and disallow TBC items. &lt;Vanilla&gt; on Sargeras is one of them. 
Kiss it. Apologiiizeee.
The reflection eternal [REunion mixtape](http://www.thehoodnerd.com/reflection-eternal-the-reunion-mixtape-download/) has respiration, definition, and a RE:definition remix.  if you don't have it, you need it.
is that guy [This guy on collegehumor](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=NtywOoT4KMs)?
The smoke monster returns!
Threw me when I went to Philly. * Whiz on dat?  * No thank you, my good sir, I would rather you *not* wiz on that. 
Oh, and we need to top off your blinker fluid. [](/troll "You don't know the first thing about automotive repair.")
While I do not follow any sports, got questionable value out of the sports that I participated in, and thought the notion of a pep rally was abhorrent, I do not think that protecting sports is a bad idea.  During economic difficulty it is normal to protect things that contribute to the communal good. I think a majority of people do derive a lot of morale from embracing relatively harmless in-group feelings of solidarity. Students that are overwhelmingly surrounded by utilitarian and expedient decisions probably are less likely to embrace the types of risk that encourage flourishing.  I think it is largely the same as the argument supporting the extreme importance of arts and other creative subjects that do not easily fit in categories of career skills for regular and safe careers.
i taught cat to respond to words "child porn".
Is there a subreddit for things like this that make you really appreciate what's important in life?
Or, perhaps I have zero interest in a press event, and I find unlikely your disgust in the speeches of only one party, unless you stand to directly benefit from the other? 
The text message spelling says otherwise.
Just a quick question... how much of this seduction happens without alcohol?
It's a bad idea to keep a condom in your wallet for a long time.  That wallet is close to your body, and thus a heat source.  Over time, exposure to heat can weaken the latex of a condom, increasing the risk of it breaking during intercourse.  With that being said, it's important for the man to carry a couple... but stock up before you go out with the intention of getting laid.  In the event of a spontaneous romp... you're SOL unless the lady happens to have a few.
Source? Off the top of my head I am thinking about how the Bush administration handled the Iraq and Afghan war. Unarmored Hummers.  The [Shinseki](http://www.nytimes.com/2007/01/12/washington/12shinseki.html) scandal. The [walter reed scandal](http://www.salon.com/news/feature/2007/04/11/kussman) [Outsourcing the war](http://www.time.com/time/magazine/article/0,9171,1599682,00.html) to private companies which takes away valuable money and resources from our armed forces.  Just because the GOP is trigger happy doesn't mean they are supportive of the troops.  Yes they like to spend on the military but that is when they are handing over tax payer money for no bid contracts to [boeing and Lockheed Martin](http://www.boston.com/news/nation/washington/articles/2009/03/05/obama_promises_to_limit_no_bid_contracts/) The GOP doesn't like to help out veterans or their families.  I know my statement is overly simplistic.  But the the GOP acts along very simplistic ideological lines.  And helping people other than the rich or large corporations is not part of the GOP's ideology.
it's  against the law? not just the rules?
Did you try the HTML5 version of youtube?
I got it. 
Meh. It's all the same thing.
did you even read the article?  inaccurate submission title, try reading it again
No, I wouldn't. Reddit is just way better. I really enjoy the "Ask" section in particular. I like reading stories about you guys. They make me feel like I'm not as weird as I thought I was. I also like the comments about those stories... helpful, intelligent, and really funny.
...because of the side boob.
My phone has a ball, so I hadn't thought about it. Vendors shouldn't be making phones without them, it's crippling.
*You read my mind!*
I can't imagine the pain of being with an insane woman who won't let me wipe my ass in private, either.   What would you do?
i concur
&gt;What kind of argument is "common practice"?  I didn't say "It's common practice, ergo it's ethical."  But the prevalence and acceptance of the practice is relevant because it's pointless to single out one person for something that everyone who breeds animals outside of the first world does.  &gt;Let's see you repeat that if you have to make the choice for yourself.  I already responded at length to someone else about this point.  I didn't mean that the experiences are the same.  But if it were me, as you suggested, then I don't really give a shit.  My main prerogative is not dying.  Being murdered in a clinical environment with needles, doesn't appeal to me more than being drowned.  The dead can't take comfort in how sterile the environment in which they were killed was, or how pleasant the method.  We do that for the survivors.  
A wider aperture would have helped to blur the background and draw attention to the dragonflies. 
Vinnie Paz from Jedi Mind Tricks has a sprinkle of violent Islamic lyrics througout his songs, many other artists I enjoy have Christian oriented lyrics here and there. Yet I still enjoy them. Not believing in a god does not mean you can't enjoy works done by people who do believe in honor of their faith.
dickies are hella-confortable, and i hardly ever use the word hella.
Meu respeitável colega, visto que são aproximadamente três horas da madrugada, ficaria-lhe muitíssimo grato se fizesse o obséquio de cessar prontamente de tocar esse gongo.
This is just search-term traffic. Website traffic (as far as Google knows) we're still behind. http://bit.ly/aCOH7Y
&gt;A sphere can't be mapped 1:1 to a plane.  Sure it can. They have the same cardinality as sets. You need to put some extra conditions like preserving angles or things like that on your bijection in order to get obstructions.
Japanese are the most bizarre group of people around
&gt;I wouldn't be surprised if the same respondents who made themselves look like sentient humans when being asked questions constructed by the New York Times Immediately gave polar opposite responses when offered a more loaded question from a right wing-affiliated pollster.   I'm not following you.  Can you give an example?
I thought it'd be like the MSG monster rearing it's ugly head again.  
I was thinking that maybe he was killed to prevent him from breaking them and sending them public. Was a little too convieniently timed.
Why the fuck would pedobear like this?  That makes absolutely no sense.
 By "day before rent is due", I meant the day before the agreed day we pay the rent, which is two days before.  Every other month, we have given him the check on this night, completely fine.  Today, we have to "deliver the check an hour away"?
I had no idea this movie was based on a book.  Off to hunt for it..
Oh my god do this!!!
Thats exactly how it should look.  I like the fact you went with the animal style fries, thats the way to go.
The site is haphazardly laid out, but I assume a beginner is supposed to examine each of the "Phases" that are listed down the left column. The actual method is to use example sentences, and concentrate on input as opposed to premature output. Most texts and methods have students test and quiz themselves before they have practiced nearly enough, so it's better to junk that system and instead just concentrate on input.
and this one?  http://vote.ratemyarms.com/node/93
Man I love looking at pictures of pretty peppers. Thanks for the post!
It makes these guys so god damn likable. Even if I don't always agree with them 100%, I want to be friends with them.
I'm a little surprised that Javier Marías isn't very popular in the US. He's a bestseller in Spain. [Tomorrow In The Battle Think On Me](http://www.amazon.com/Tomorrow-Battle-Think-Javier-Marias/dp/0151002762) is a reasonable starting point.
My god I just can't stand it. For what exactly does he deserve wasting 5 years of his life? Yeah he's a real bad man, that one... smoking weed and then.. you know.. reading a book. 
I don't get it.   When I saw the pic front page I thought that was a bed not a treadmill.  This is more demotivational than dream chasing.
So I was impressed, but what happens when you enter an address to a house that's in a cul-de-sac?
I've been inserting drops all day for allergies - I'll try this tonight!
I actually read that earlier this year. For better or worse, McCarthy's the only writer he criticized that I've actually read anything by, so it was a little hard for me to judge most of it.  That said, while I mostly agree with Myers' sentiments, I thought he was a bit too harsh.
bless you. ^_^
In a perfect world there would be a torrent site that only dealt with text books and they would take donations and buy and rip books.  That is the ultimate concept of free information in my... opinion.
So many people will call this some kind of empty victory declaration and useless, but it is truly a huge milestone that we've come to. All wars in history eventually come to an end, and the beginning of the end is the halting of actual combat. This is great news. Make no mistake on that.
I assume by this statement, by the by, that you've been to San Francisco? 
All of them. Circlejerk is that way -----&gt;
new born puppies probably can't fall that far and survive.
I'm not sure I like this so much. One of the nice things about Reddit is that there isn't a judgment placed on any "caste" of people.
I knew this post's title seemed familiar, but I could not think of what the hell it was from. Upvote for having Hand Banana in the top comment :)
So if 2 of the 3 sources you cite are comedy shows, I think we have a problem.  Comedy by design presents a very caricatured view of reality.  That is what makes it entertaining.  Everything becomes black and white and the absurdity that the oversimplified picture takes on makes people laugh.  They are not supposed to replace real news sources.  And for complete and fair stories, no, reddit doesn't really count either.
What's worse than a worm in your apple?  The Holocuast.
&gt;  but in the end it's a feature with limited use.  Not really. I use and see time-saving and code-simplifying macros all the time.
NO YOU DON'T REST YOUR CASE I REST MY CASE
Well that's fucking ridiculous. Dude's obviously looking for a foofoo girl or has an unexpressed motive. Keep on being awesome. 
Trolling will now be known as tenning.
Yeah sure!  Isis - [Not In Rivers, But In Drops](http://vimeo.com/1949067)  Pelican - [Final Breath](http://vimeo.com/8069313)  Russian Circles - [Harper Lewis](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ma27diEPqB0) (sorry, no good video)  Red Sparowes - [In Illusions of Order](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=6UA9GwejwkE)  I personally love just about every song all these guys do, but I think those should give you a good taste of what their other stuff is like.
On my 2008 Macbook pro, Any video plays fine but after a few seconds, the fan starts to be noisy. I have iStatPro installed and I can see that firefox, or whatever browser i use is taking most of my CPU. Yep flash sucks on macs, not the latest ones i guess. The 2010 Macbooks are supposed to use hardware acceleration with flash. Could anyone tell if i'ts working smoothly and silently with those new machines ?
This is not surprising. Many (if not most) water supplies are NOT filtered through a membrane, rather it's passed through a bed of sand and gravel to catch the big stuff. [EPA has a simple graphic of water treatment](http://water.epa.gov/learn/kids/drinkingwater/watertreatmentplant_index.cfm). Treatment like reverse osmosis would remove those copepods and more, but they're harmless really.
Well it was actually about one and a half, I think.
Looks like your friend and you should be sharing a bed together...
&gt;"I think their positions are fairly lightweight," he told AM. "I've heard their viewpoint many times, and I simply disagree with them dramatically.
This is the [Citarum River](http://www.google.com/images?q=Citarum%20river&amp;oe=utf-8&amp;rls=org.mozilla:en-US:official&amp;client=firefox-a&amp;um=1&amp;ie=UTF-8&amp;source=og&amp;sa=N&amp;hl=en&amp;tab=wi&amp;biw=1280&amp;bih=544) in Java, I think.
Because people are assholes and can't understand that people have different opinions. Most people on here want to appear to be so supportive and Tolerant of everyone else especially if it's something controversial. I guess when it comes to AMA's you are only supposed to ask questions not have a fucken opinion about the matter!
People still watch Diggnation? I thought the only people who cared anymore were Kevin Rose fanwankers.
Er, what I mean by Legacy is non-Standard... What term am I looking for?
the same. Maybe too soon. He's not a full blown meme yet I guess.
God damn it! How hard is it to not be a partisan hack, SERIOUSLY! Listen to yourself, quit drinking the cool aid. Both parties suck!
For me? You shouldn't have. If you live in San Francisco I can return the favor!
The Metro Area stuff is good, but I really recommend you check out Unclassics: http://pitchfork.com/reviews/albums/3664-unclassics/  In terms of disco, I can go on...
You will, without question, get busted if you smoke in the house. And like everyone else has already said, you probably wont get all that high the first time. Although, I was rocked the first time I smoked, I sang "i want to get away" by lenny kravitz while my buddys mom drove me home. not sweet.
Under the embeded maps you'll see lines like: 2008 Dufferin--Caledon Google Maps Link  The riding name (Dufferin--Caledon) is a link to the kml file. Originally I just had a link to the kml file. I notice that it's not so clear with the embeded map and Google maps link.  Also if you have Google Earth check this out: [3D Bar graph of funding by forward sorting area for M postal codes](http://www.waltermiller.ca/map-links/link-m.kml)
counter strike source
I have never had that happen in my life, ever. I live with out regrets.  [](/poker) ... ....  [](/okay)
Probably much more so than Lovecraft's work, yes... but I was just making a jestful jab that Lovecraft's work is much more accepted over in Japan than it is in the West.
If you feel worse, that's a red flag, tell your doctor. But once you start seeing your psychiatrist that will be a lot better.
&gt; you can use static analysis tools to ensure correctness, so I fail to see why static typing is required to be part of the language itself  Why haven't you said in your original statement that you were talking about dynamically type checked languages when used with additional static type checking tools?
11/10  Happy?
oh oh oh! Can I be the giant asshole? *oh wait*..
Probably a different tap. That is most likely a commercial tap.
Might be able to check it out.  He'll be home later, I'll tell him to get in touch with you.
I take it you're not American...or you're over 65 years old maybe. 
Looks like diggers figured out how to self-post.  Shit.  Just kidding.  It's great to have you guys.  The more the merrier!
I weep for in and out.  and you went animal style....i am so jealous.
Because the U.S. military is in Afghanistan fighting and dying to help that country protect it's way of life from the Taliban... and apparently that way of life includes the accepted culture of pedophilia.  This has nothing to do with religion or Islam - it has to do with an ingrained perverse culture. I'm glad I'm not in the U.S. military dying and getting wounded over there.  It would disgust me.  
You do realize the heavy metals required to make a prius are more environmentally damaging than using a well maintained car that runs on unleaded, right?
IT'S LIKE HE CAN INFLUENCE YOUR THOUGHTS WITH LETTERS ON THE SCREEN!
I only meant I might be wrong about some of what I said, but yes I am aware counting is legal. The casino can throw you out because you win to much, or they don't like your shorts, they make the rules. 
Thanks, ha. But I am unfortunately still a fat chick. 5'11 at 215 makes me borderline obese.
The throw will still be at 100 mph relative to the truck, which is moving at 70 mph relative to the ground, so the ball is moving at 170 mph relative to the ground.  The trick is keeping the rest of the baseball players and umpires from noticing the truck.
Billie Jean -  Michael Jackson
Haha okay, I don't watch the Office, but one look at the picture on wikipedia and I can see him making that quote. Nicely done. I guess my reaction was exactly what the scriptwriters would be looking for.
This. Pretty much all pressing problems are reducible to problems of  * Energy * Money * Politics * Time (specifically human time expenditure i.e. effort)
I don't think you can look at patents without considering monetary concerns because that's what they're *for*. The original purpose of a patent was to reward the first developer of a product protection for the time/effort/cost they have invested in developing the product. However the current use of patents appears (again, IMO) to be rampant trolling for cash. e.g.  * 1. create one product * 2. patent as much as you possibly can  * 3. spend the rest of your life raping the shit out of anyone who even comes close to your patent. * 4. profit  Since suing for patent infringement is a viable source of income for the company, I would say this reduces innovation; the original company doesn't need to, and any new companies can't for fear of infringing a patent.  If patents didn't exist, how would you protect the time/effort/cost you have invested in developing your product? Is there any way you could do this without creating the conditions we have now?
Hm, excellent answer.  On an unrelated note, I keep trying to bring back armpit hair, but you're right. Not gonna happen :(
The comments in this thread are absolutely disgusting.  You should be fucking ashamed of yourselves for this blind hatred against the civilians gunned down in cold blood.  Nothing excuses what happened today.  This was a blatant attempt by Hamas to disrupt the peace process.  The fact that they are proud of what they've done speaks volumes about their motivations, and the continuing double standard in this entire subreddit regarding Israel and the Palestinians is utterly incomprehensible.  You seriously need to pull your heads out of your own asses and join the rest of humanity.
upvote for knowing this and putting iggy only behind motown. that's exactly right. 
The trollties get me every time. [](/perfect)
I only complain of camping when someone sits in a corner of a building and waits for people to walk buy them. They are not assisting their team, they are not even attempting to be offensive; they are simply waiting for someone to get close enough to them so that they can get 1 kill...
Uh, I do this all the time and never have any problem. Something's wrong with your schmekle.
One thing that is important to do with a boycott, is to make sure one actually stops boycotting the company if the company changes their way. ie give the companies some incentive to take up these expensive measures to change their ways. Make it profitable for the companies despite the extra expense. 
Uptoked, because I just drove past Flaming Lips Alley not even 30 minutes ago.
The Bank of America building in downtown Austin (6th and congress) gives you a grace period of 5 minutes before you are charged 2 dollars for the first half hour. You read that right. 5 minutes.
I was in London in 2005 when it was taking off, it was pretty exciting  Its great music to dance and party but the only artist whose album I listen to repeatedly is Burial, who probably can't be boxed in as a dubstep artist.
I would say that you need to ease into the Mad Men style of show with a few shows that are slow, but not that slow. Breaking Bad is the easiest to get into (1st episode has the pace of a movie), while The Wire takes about 4 episodes to really latch on. Although, it is hard to convince people to watch 4 hours of TV before you get really into it.  Here is my list, somewhat in order: The Wire, Breaking Bad, OZ, Mad Men, Deadwood, and Extras/Curb Your Enthusiasm for a laugh. If you really enjoy The Wire, then I would definitely check out Generation Kill and Treme. Of course Boardwalk Empire is starting soon as well. I also enjoy Always Sunny and 30 Rock if you haven't checked those out. 
I don't think you should be so cavalier in dropping the R-bomb, implied or not
I don't like his couching of the persecution as "they used to be persecuted historically." But some admonition is better then none.
I've never seen a brand new inmate. They don't come to my facility until they have at least spent time in the Diagnostic &amp; Evaluation Center, which is where it's determined how dangerous they might be, whether or not they have friends/enemies in the system. Once you get assigned to an actual prison, it's up to us officers to protect you if you let us. If you come on the yard acting like a cocky little prick, you'll get your ass messed up the same as if you walked into the wrong part of [insert big city name here]
Here are some short answers to common issues:  * The establishment of the Jewish state violated the right of Palestinian Arabs to self-determination  * Israel expelled the Palestinians in 1948 and has consistently taken over Palestinian land  * Most of the area of Israel was once Arab owned  *  Arabs formed a majority of the population in Palestine, and the Zionists were colonialists from Europe who had no claim to or right to the land of Israel  * Israel humiliated Palestinians during the second intifada (2001-2005) and continue to treat them inhumanely  * Israel's settlements are illegal  * Palestinians are victims of Israeli aggression
&gt;That's precisely my point; if the government doesn't step in to care for people during a recession, nobody else will.  Wow, you are wrong on wrong's wrongest day.  I work for a Catholic Church that, like every other Catholic Church, runs a food pantry that's also associated with the [Society of St. Vincent de Paul](http://www.svdpusa.org/).  It's gotten lean a few times, but I've never seen it completely bare.  They also help people pay their utility bills, have NA meetings, etc.  And this is accomplished by a parish that has one of the lowest tithing rates in the state.  So, as you can see, if government doesn't step in to care for people during a recession, plenty of others will.
3D Doritos, man. They were kinda like Bugles but way yummier and more fun to eat than regular Doritos. They also came in a convenient little canister. Oh how I miss them. :'(
Lithium makes me chubby and makes my eye twitch **TRUE STORY**
Times have changed. In my calc class (honors section, BTW) there were no women. The university had just invented a new pseudo-math class called Qualitative Analysis to accommodate the newly categorized "math disability" students. It should come as no surprise that they were mostly women (and football players).
Hot Pie!
1.  Dark Tranquillity (Melodic death metal) 2.  Depeche Mode (synth pop) 3.  Jaga Jazzist (jazz / nu-jazz) 4.  Turbonegro (deathpunk) 5.  Justice (house)
Defending Chavez is so hipster.
&gt; a baseball pitcher can throw a ball 100mph  &gt; how fast will he throw it?  Maybe you've asked the wrong question. Also please learn apostrophes and commas.
Fuck him. He's obviously a loon and Labor doesn't need him anyway.
you press up and the piece goes straight to the bottom.
I thought it was "...money I hoped would go to (charity and good) works to fight gay marriage"
      o       |     ,'~'.    /  \      |   ____|_      |  '___,,_'   .----------------.      |  ||(o |o)|    ( open ur mind 2 new culture    |   -------   ,----------------'      |  _____|   -'      \  '####,    -------     /________\   (  )  |)   '_ ' ,------|\   _     /_ /  |   |_\  ||    /_ /|  |  o| _\   _||    /_ / |  |   |\ _\____//' |  (  (  |  |   | (_,_,_,____/   \ _\ |   ------|      \ _\|_________|     \ _\ \__\\__\     |__| |__||__|  ||/__/  |__||__|    |__||__|    |__||__|    /__)/__)      /__//__/     /__//__/    /__//__/.     .' '.   '.    (_kOs____)____)
Of course you're right... Inflated egos are extremely hard to burst. It does happen though and with almost universally positive results.  An inflated ego is a person's worst enemy.  I do still think that honesty is the best approach here.  The important things to communicate would be:   *  I was genuinely trying to be nice and helpful and you put me down which is extremely rude *  Being a dumb ungrateful bitch isn't a good thing *  Being a smart competent helpful person *is* a good thing *  Regardless of all your time in the sun talking to real friends about real issues you're a pretty lousy friend  I'll admit.. the likely results will simply be more ego protection but.... if you are kind, but persistent you will probably provoke some extreme behaviors because life is full of moments when reality wounds people's ego.  A persons normal reaction is to sweep that data under the rug.. to forget it, minimize it, explain it away and ignore it. Don't let them. Take the opportunity to emphasize their failure, explicitly draw the conclusions that their ego defense would prevent them from drawing and simply, without malice, sate them.  If she gets in a car accident simply say it's ok to make a mistake,  not everyone is a good driver.  Fails a test?  Not everyone's smart, at least she's not retarded, and lots of people are too lazy to study.  Punctuate the moments where reality clashes with her ego and simply and clearly point out the truth of the situation watch the fun of an ego flailing wildly to protect itself from reality.  Or if you really cant stand her.. stroke that ego like mad.  Nobody ends up quite as miserable as someone with an enormous ego and nothing to back it.
I had no idea it was 7-11 brand but I recently told my friend they should start selling alcohol since they've been making their own "ice tea" now.  Had one of these at a friends party when I was already shit faced on vodka.  I made someone look for hot sauce in the fridge to put in it before I'd drink it.  My friend said he had one &amp; it tasted like shit.
I love going grocery shopping high, except I always end up coming home with dunkaroos and fruit roll ups and never anything on the list!
I got the message saying it doesn't contain enough Street-View for everything and got a few black boxes towards the beginning. Pretty cool.
A friend of mine and his brother got taken for about $1600 in a very similar apartment scam.  They demanded 1st and last months rent upfront before the keys could be mailed.  Amazingly, they paid up even though they hadn't actually been in the apartment.   The scammer's follow up was to claim that the person with the keys was in a major car accident before she could mail them.  They also had the audacity to request financial assistance for the medical bills in order to hasten the mailing of the keys. So yeah, good on you for catching it as being fake.  
Wait what? No Apple TV? ;)
That's friggin' awesome.  Go you!  I'm decently active, but I've always been a piss-poor runner and today I made it 10k.  It damn-near killed me, but I did it.
I wonder how many people god shit on.
far too much is suspect about this... 
I downvoted because The Dark Knight did it better.
1 % there, we need to keep it going!   Get to http://www.facebook.com/group.php?gid=150942998258775 and join up!
Is the pelvic exam necessary or just for your benefit? There is no OF COURSE on the patient's end. They expect the medical team to perform medically necessary procedures ONLY.
&gt;2nd and 3rd term abortions are not allowed, however, adoptions would be cheaper and highly encouraged.  I'm glad to see you still want to retain the rights over a woman's body.  &gt;Murder and rape are punishable by death. Prisons serve only "vitaloaf", with no TV, no internet, no weight lifting, no radio, no music, but books would be okay. Prison is not fun, recreational time. It is prison, and should be treated as such. It should really, really suck, so no one ever wants to go back. No time off for good behavior. No treating celebrities like something special. They all go to the same jails.  Because jails are such wonderful and loving places right now.  Like Disney Land really if you think about it.  &gt;Stealing results in the theif working for minimum wage, per hour, for the person who they stole from, cleaning the house, the car, doing the yard, until they pay for what they stole.  Minimum wage?  You support the minimum wage?  Having the big bad government force employers to pay it's employees a minimum wage won't earn you any points here.  And if I catch someone stealing from me the last thing I want is to have them around my business.  &gt;Teachers, firemen, police officers, and the army would all get paid more.  Where's the money come from?  &gt;Unions would be completely optional. You could join one if you wanted, not just because you worked somewhere that required it. In fact, no place would be allowed to require it.  Unions are optional.  If you want to join you can.  If the job requires it because the other workers that were there before you negotiated that then the job is not for you.  You have a choice.
yeah, that's normal.  Want to help her out with that problem?  Buy a vibrator and use it during sex.
Usually it's a choice of processed American or processed provolone. Some real Italian places will use real provolone. 
And not just the doctors, but the whole hospital staff that helped with patient care, including the nurses and techs.
For those crying "racism". This is obviously an old comic. The text boxes are either edited or typed over for clarity. 
The only one of these that I approve of.
http://imgur.com/qB1VK
While that would be fucking awesome, keep dreamin'...
My first thought was Nibbler from Futurama, until I moused over the logo.
acognitive assonance.  Emphasis on the 'ass'.
"Opponents of the age restriction say they've been harassed"  Sucks that someone who is trying to limit other people freedoms would fell 'Harassed' while doing so.  Fuck HOA's
Why is he collecting straws in his boat?
Chances are you wont be able to, it'll cost more to get it repaired than to get a replacement, and even if you got the parts you can't be sure whether it's the plug or the adapter.  You can get refurb laptops online for $200 that are more powerful than what you currently have if you're strapped. Otherwise, it's probably not worth it. 
Are you sitting outside in front of some garbage bags with your phone in hand, waiting for an answer?  Seriously?
It's fucking shit like this that contributes to society thinking people who smoke weed are a bunch of worthless bums.
[Yes](http://zombtracker.the-zomb.com/details.php?id=35997)
Reverse Reverse Polish Notation
Nay, but he is surprisingly good at punching me in the balls when I get home from work and he's losing his mind with excitement.
Detroit (hahaha i'm so funny, admit it Reddit!)
I think after a while, when you've gone through most genres of music and decided what you like the most, you realise that the whole musical hate thing is absolutely pointless and you stop caring about what other people listen to.
[The *Arcadia*](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=qQrnZw2hSsA) Who wouldn't want a pirate spaceship with a great big knife sticking out the front?
How do you make a little girl cry twice?
Then disprove it?
&gt;It takes a great deal of faith to be an Atheist, to believe in a chain of nearly impossibly small probabilities that from the time of the big bang to now and into the future, life could develop and flourish and eventually fade away to nothingness.  We do not "believe" any of this, we "accept" it because it's the most plausible explanation from what we know of the natural world.  Bring forth something that is more plausible, and we'll gladly accept it. Hint : It's not God. We went over that explanation already and found it lacking.
Thank you.  I've been playing good lately but mostly I have one or two holes that destroy my goal of breaking 80.  I screwed up at 12, a double, but managed to keep things going after that.  It feels good.  Good luck in breaking 80.  I think lots of it is psychological,  and lots is course management, the rest being good play. 
your*  And I'd say they're kind of apprehensively supportive. I'm lucky to have parents that are understanding and are doing financially okay right now. That said I think they do get annoyed with me living here. I clean up any messes in common areas but my room is always a mess and I think that bothers them even though I'd prefer they never even looked in here. I think it's just a matter of messing up their normal routine more than anything. So yeah they are supportive, but I'm sure they're looking forward to me moving out (again.) 
I like to think of it in D&amp;D perspective, Occupation - Nerd +10 to random information recall
And then real tea party people show up and they become their own satire!  Brilliant!
the fact that it was my first mmo might have something to do with my nostalgia.
I'm a girl. I have belching contests with my friends, family, and SO.
I don't know why everyone here is acting like the fall of digg and the reddit spike is a good thing - it will spell the dumbing down and mainstreamification of reddit to the point we'll just be the new old digg. that make any sense?  tl;dr: prepare for the lolcats and ASCII
Go to some cosplay forums. I (or anyone) could throw together a better looking shield for 50 dollars, and that's probably a large over-estimate.
I came.
I really want to make one, kits online are pretty cheap, around 100 bucks and you just modify an old minifridge and BAM.. yummy beer.
Yes, he's being an asshole. That's it. Nobody's getting hurt, no puppies are being kicked, nobody's losing anything except a little time. Being an asshole _is_ acceptable.   Likeable? No. Attractive? No. There's lots of things being an asshole isn't.  Acceptable? Yes, being an asshole is acceptable.  Vandalism, especially in this case, is not acceptable. There is no great harm, there should be no great foul. Put a note on the window calling them assholes - that's a little more in line.
DOUBLE RAINBOW. 
Sure. Going forward, I'll make this happen. 
Welll damn, if that ain't just a beautiful thing...  Edit:[7]
it's a place where clubbers, all-weekend-partygoers and tourists come together, paying to be delivered a dose of mainstream formatted "that's what you wanna hear" music in order to sell booze to raise money.  it's age restricted: no one under 18 has the right to access culture because we need to make money.   not to mention there's enough drug dealers floating around the place to feed the crowd. nothing out the ordinary, really. but this is not my kind of event. igloofest is the same people doing a different but same event during winter. for example, you can enter piknic with booze if you come with food, but on the other hand you'll be searched and stripped of any alcohol to be allowed to enter.
Oh, a boy can dream...
It's not only the consumers who get screwed over by the CC companies it's also the merchants too. The discount rate we pay Visa and MC for allowing customers to use cards is always changing. Sure there is the base rate we pay, but then we have to pay the surprise extra rate depending on the specific card itself. The extra rate can be up to an EXTRA 1.5% so when your card gives you "cash back" the merchant is actually the one paying for it, it's not even coming out of the greedy profit that the CC companies make.  Don't even get me started on CC fraud....
  ,           ," e`---o   ((          (  | ___,'    \\~-------------------------------' \_;/    (    comment archived     /    /) ._______________________________.  )   (( (          (( (  ``-'          ``-' 
Good choices all around.
This is exactly what I came here to post. Well said, MacEWork. Conservatism is based on fear, specifically of things changing, so it makes sense to speak to conservatives in a way they are most accustomed to understanding. You won't care if President Obama was born in Kenya if your house is being destroyed by a super-storm or you can't have fresh water because what used to be the rain that filled the reservoir shifted away from you. 
That's 12chan, also known as 12-and-uinder-chan.
Yeah, I'm pretty sure calling me a karmawhore when I'm specifically doing the opposite is the proper definition of irony.
Moshing as well?
We're talking about a multi-million dollar space flight.  The marginal cost of those calories is literally inconsequential.
Because it has some good points on why people shouldn't waste their money on martial arts and we would like to hear your thoughts on those arguments since P &amp;T are normally fairly one sided. 
YES YOU DO.
It's like this... if your neighbor pulled up in a Ferrari, wouldn't you say something like "Wow, that's a cool car!"   Same way, when people see you walk up to them, they say "Wow, you are tall!"   If your neighbor pulled up to you in a Toyota, you probably wouldn't say anything, right? Toyotas are a dime a dozen.  You should consider vacationing in the Netherlands, being tall there is extremely common. You would not stand out much.
So smurfs. Do they really pay 60 extra dollars so they can stomp on noobs and laugh?
Oh.. oops. Thanks for letting me know. It says the model is PP05L
why don't you talk to him about your concerns?  
One time I put some cream cheese on a bagle without knowing it as salmon flavored cream cheese. That first bite was pure hell. Fish is never a flavor you want to get without expecting it.
Today I called Bank of America to ask them a question and I wanted to talk to a person, they gave me 8 options. None of them got me connected to a person. I moved most of my banking to Charles Schwab and have only had good experiences with them.
you could very well be right. Nobody really knows -- the evidence-based experimental research has not been done. This reminds me of those pictures of jets "actually breaking the sound barrier." There is a big disk of white stuff behind the cockpit. One turned out to be completely shopped. However, there were other genuine photographs. The explanations always came down to yes and no.
Facebook? More like *FUCK YOU AND YOUR FUCKING WEBSITE ZUCKERBERG YOU FUCK* ...book.  Ha.
Fuck his chalkboard.
First off if you're trying to support anything lower than IE7 you need to start charging additional money. Lots of additional money.  Second, if it doesn't work in IE7 you need to figure out what you're doing wrong. It's not that hard to get a site to work in IE7+ as long as you're not doing anything too crazy. If you are doing something fancy use JQuery, it almost always works in 7+.
I think I've heard it used in bowling, ping pong, tennis and basketball but I could be wrong. 
[](/son "you bastards!") Reddit, I am fucking disappoint. 
Hi, you're missing a question mark. Here, take this: ?
&gt;But Tom Prichard, head of the Minnesota Family Council and a proponent of abstinence-only sex education, said he was pleased with Pawlenty's decision. "It's better to spend no money on sex education if it's going to have a condom message," Prichard said. "You are pouring fuel on the fire."  People like this guy are ignorant fucking morons.  
She's right, its not ok to talk about that, because life is choices and you made yours. You can choose to date someone or not date someone and you knew going in, obviously because it annoys you that you had to wait around to date her while she did other things. If you knew all this going in and chose to date her anyway you don't get to be resentful. After all, if it bothered you you could just not date someone. You're trying to make her responsible for the decisions you made in life when you tell her how what she did makes you sad. What do you want, some kind of apology for her not being into you back then?
I bet playing 4 player split screen does wonders at preventing everyone playing recon.
Snore...
Carajo huele bicho son las 3 y media de la maniana! Vete pal carajo canto de maricon.
the swirving makes me dizzy. I puke when I'm dizzy.
Quicktime events will now own everyone. GREY  LIGHTER GREY  DARKER GREY  PLATINUM Cr
No prob. I got a nook a few months ago and LOVE IT, but only if I don't try to do anything but read. I get pissed just waiting for the store to load, for cryin out loud.
I stared good and hard at it again after I posted that. The space is not quite enough to put text of the same weight as below, and it appears I was wrong. I believe you. But it is hard to believe. Plus I've seen quite a few shops in my time, pixels, etc.
Better than this http://pic.aebn.net/Stream/Movie/Boxcovers/a103247_xlf.jpg  from your wife's pov.  NSFW
wait, bacon isnt a vegetable? There is treachery afoot. 
[O'O] *Whaddyou know about Rrrraay Finkle?*
I just moved to a credit union today.  Yeeeaaaaaahhh.
lol QQ
The fuck did I do?!
Anti-biotics are a good reason to avoid factory farmed chickens. That's a good article, it also mentions an example of tomatoes from spain being better for the environment than local swedish tomatoes.  Bottom line: it's nuanced, not as simple as you might expect, and you need to do your research.  In any case, if you live in LA, you don't need to worry about any of this, just the people who drive distances less than a mile, thereby almost certainly increasing your risk of cancer more than an occasional smoking habit.  Why do americans drive such short distances with their cars? As a non-american it really annoys me. Here we all bike or walk around our cities and only use the car to go from city a to city b.
the frequency was too low due to their unfathomable density
Can somebody reverse digg my unvote?
I heard that BP's new plan for future oil spills is to give a blindfold to everyone that might see the oil. If you can't see it, it's not there. LA LA LA.  Now back to my tasty diet beverage made with Calamari water...
You can be my paypal!
Pisting yawa, a las tresmedia! Su suca ako sa kang nanai!
African or European swallow?
Yo soy de Tijuana, y si vemos a diario en las noticias que aparecen encobijados o hay balaceras, pero suelen ser en las colonias remotas donde una persona inteligente no se metería de todas formas, sabiendo que no te iría bien el entrar ahí. A lo que voy es, que si hay muertes a diario aquí, pero no suelen suceder enfrente de la ciudadanía. Inclusive no me ha tocado ninguna situación así de balaceras o algo.
It's not really the same situation at all if you have an actual medical reason to remove the foreskin.  I don't think anyone has a problem with that.
&gt;It's less impersonal that way.  I think you mean more personal. You are speaking to an English major after all.
Somebody had their lunch money stolen in school...
[Don't forget about Irish folk music.](http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=S_Va0ojp-Dk)
Oh god I hope that weird Al isn't a redditor.
...such as?
Oh, sorry! That should have read 'just beat up Penn again' not 'just beat up Penn'....
why?
Wowee, thanks for my new desktop wallpaper!
How about a /r/sctournaments or something like that?  Let the people who want the info sign up for it and let the others ignore it.  Then maybe once every so often there could be a reminder 'Join sctournaments' announcement in this reddit.
By all means he can come anywhere he wants to. He knows this.
That's fucking racist.
The house I grew up in burned down when I was 13. I didn't know that someone rebuilt it to look like it did before. Emotional appeal win.
Greysomething monkeys?
o man, that made my heart sad.
9,993,454 bottles of beer on the wall, 9,993,454 bottles of beer. Take one down and pass it around — 9,993,453 bottles of beer on the wall!
WE ARE...
This was exactly how I felt. It was really well done, and my understanding of the history of the country is limited besides certain highlights. 
I don't see how one can complain. The sign clearly says "Attention customers: we cannot be responsible".
As much as I would love to have a president who tells the truth about things like this, I don't believe it's ever going to happen - for a few reasons. First and foremost being the damage to the morale of the armed forces that it could possibly cause.  How would you feel if you just put your life on the line and risked your sanity for something you believed in and then your commander-in-chief told you it was pointless?  Any sane person knows it was pointless at best and made us less secure at worst, but you still don't really want to hear the  President say that.  Second, Obama really doesn't need to give the neo-cons more ammo to go after him.  They already invent enough shit as it is.  They'd have a field day if he came out and said what the real repercussions of this war were.  So while I wish Obama would tell the truth, I can't really fault him for towing the line.  I think he has a lot more to lose from being honest than he does to gain.  And that's the bigger problem.
They're not all closed down:  http://www.sambosrestaurant.com/610/index.htm
Micro-payments could be a solution to this issue, by substantially reducing the effort spent to make tiny purchases.  In at least one such scheme, there isn't even a transaction executed at the bank except probabilistically, so you pay $10 roughly once every 10 transactions, which comes out fair in the end if you use the system enough (and randomization inhibits gaming).  But so far, none of that has amounted to much (heh).
It's been too long since I had a good slushie. Also, "ents" (or "treeple") are explained in the FAQ
Any movie released in theatres starring Tom Cruise as the lead actor. I'm uncomfortable spending money that might end up in the coffers of the Church of Scientology.
as opposed to not obeying laws?
I second this.
This will be great against Al Queda's airforce!  They won't dare attack our fighters now
Invented time travel.
Keyboard navigation.
I know the story you speak of but it didn't go down quite like that.  He made a Jedi for himself, and got caught.  The god powers thing was impossible to give players.  Some times we would have to log into a player's account to fix them, and in doing so we might make them invisible and forgot to take off invisibility when we were done.  This lead to some interesting events, but they were unintentional.
Thanks, liberals!
Yes, effect a change on that immediately.
It handles git just fine, *IF* there's still a central repository somewhere that you can point it at. I don't think it'd work correctly without that.
So what you're saying is that I should wake and bake before class? Check. 
Button functionalities compared:  Home, Back, Menu, Search, Recent Apps, Bring up virtual keyboard, Voice Search (Call, End, Camera) vs Home, Screenshot, (Recent Apps)
Well, sure. This is a valid point if he had said that his lecture was from another source when I asked.
For real, my neck is aching!
Commit a felony.
He choked on a doughnut. I hit him in the back of the head with a baseball bat to try to get him to spit it out, but he just gave up and died. What a pussy.
